








Keith E. Wandell - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Keith E. Wandell
Interim Chairman at Dana Incorporated


View Full Profile
Are you Keith E. Wandell? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Keith E. Wandell's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Keith E. Wandell's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Keith E. Wandell's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Keith E. Wandell through your network of contacts.
												








Keith E. Wandell's Executive Work History


Current


Interim Chairman, 
Dana Incorporated


Board Member, 
Constellation Brands, Inc.


Board Member, 
Dover Corporation


Past
To view Keith E. Wandell's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
67

 
 


Keith E. Wandell's Biography



Mr. Wandell, age 67, is the retired Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer of Harley-Davidson, Inc., a global motorcycle manufacturer. He served as Chairman of the Board from February 2012 to April 2015 and as President and Chief Executive Officer from May 2009 until May 2015. Prior to that, Mr. Wandell served as the President and Chief Operating Officer of Johnson Controls, Inc., a global manufacturer of automotive, power and building solutions from 2006 to 2009. He also served at Johnson Controls as Executive Vice President from 2005 to 2006; Corporate Vice President from 1997 to 2005; President of the Automotive Exper ...
(Read More)

			Mr. Wandell, age 67, is the retired Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer of Harley-Davidson, Inc., a global motorcycle manufacturer. He served as Chairman of the Board from February 2012 to April 2015 and as President and Chief Executive Officer from May 2009 until May 2015. Prior to that, Mr. Wandell served as the President and Chief Operating Officer of Johnson Controls, Inc., a global manufacturer of automotive, power and building solutions from 2006 to 2009. He also served at Johnson Controls as Executive Vice President from 2005 to 2006; Corporate Vice President from 1997 to 2005; President of the Automotive Experience business from 2003 to 2006; and President of the Power Solutions business from 1998 to 2003. Mr. Wandell has served as Chairman of the Board of Exide Technologies, a global provider of stored electrical energy solutions, since April 30, 2015. Mr. Wandell is a director and the Non-Executive Chairman of the Board of Dana Holding Corporation (NYSE: DAN), a world leader in the supply of highly engineered drivetrain, sealing, and thermal-management technologies, and a director of Dover Corp. (NYSE: DOV), a diversified global manufacturer. Mr. Wandell served as a director of Harley-Davidson, Inc. from 2009 until April 2015. Mr. Wandell is a former chief executive officer of a public company and brings to the Board his expertise in executive leadership, international business matters, operations, and oversight of a global premium brand.
		
Source: Constellation Brands, Inc. on 03/16/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Keith E. Wandell's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Keith E. Wandell. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Keith E. Wandell's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Keith E. Wandell's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Keith E. Wandell through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Keith E. Wandell


















Keith E. Wandell's Connections (200)





Sign up now to view Keith E. Wandell's 200 connections »









James H. Keyes
Former Chairman, Johnson Controls









Gregg M. Sherrill
Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Tenneco Inc.









James A. McCaslin
Board Member, American Axle & Manufacturing Holdings, Inc.









Jeffrey A. Joerres
Board Member, Johnson Controls









Kristiane C. Graham
Board Member, Dover Corporation









Michael B. Stubbs
Board Member, Dover Corporation









Martha F. Brooks
Board Member, Jabil, Inc.









Stephen K. Wagner
Board Member, Dover Corporation









Barry K. Allen
Former Executive Vice President, Operations, Qwest Communications International









Judy A. Schmeling
President, Cornerstone Brands, Inc. and Chief Operating Officer, HSN, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









Jan Koum
Board Member, Facebook, Inc.









Robert D. Perlmutter
Senior EVP and COO, The Macerich Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993















KEITH E WANDELL - MEQUON, WI - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



WI



MEQUON



Business Services, Nec



Business Services At Non-commercial Site



                            KEITH E WANDELL
                                    



 





















K 


KEITH E WANDELL
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



3747 ASHLEY LN MEQUON, WI 53092
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $71,000.00
 Employee Count --
 Industries Business Services At Non-commercial Site
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Keith E Wandell is located at 3747 Ashley Ln in Mequon and has been in the business of Business Services At Non-commercial Site since 2010. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







K

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Keith E. Wandell | Northwest Harley Blog | Page 2




































Home
About
Engine History
Events
Packing List
Safety






Northwest Harley Blog
Whatever it is, it's better in the wind…



Feeds:
Posts
Comments






Posts Tagged ‘Keith E. Wandell’


Keith Wandell Plays Wizard

					Posted in Brand, Dealer News, Earnings, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, tagged Booyah, CEO, Debra Borchardt, Dyna Wide Glide, Financial Success, H-D, H-D employee discount, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Interview, Keith E. Wandell, Keith Wandell, Mr. Wandell, Road King Classic, Rockin', Street Glide CVO, The Street, Wizard on August 29, 2011|
													2 Comments » 


Keith Wandell doing The Street Interview
Haven’t you heard? The CEO of Harley-Davidson, Keith Wandell has decided to take time off from the company in order to pursue his dream of playing keyboard in a band named “Wizard.”
Just kidding—unless you’ve been hiding under a rock, you probably already know what Keith is up to this week.  He’s coming off a “Booyah” financial quarter where by every financial measure the company has generated improvements.
I ran across this video where Mr. Wandell does an interview with The Street reporter Debra Borchardt.   He’s in the press “hot seat” and provided some insights into H-D’s relative success in the 1H 2011.  The Street — is a leading provider of financial news, commentary, analysis, ratings, and business and investment content, made available through online publications, content syndication and audio and video programming.
Side Bar: Mr. Wandell has come a long way from the initial days of not owning or riding a motorcycle to where today he owns three!  He rides a Street Glide CVO 2011; Road King Classic; and Dyna Wide Glide.  That H-D employee discount must be working out for him.
The bottom line of the interview is Harley-Davidson is rockin’ with Mr. Wandell!
Photo courtesy of The Street.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




A Toast To Keith Wandell

					Posted in Advertising, Age, Brand, Brand Loyalty, Dealer News, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Schwag (Free Stuff), Women Clubs, tagged Arbor Mist, Black Velvet Canadian Whisky, Blackstone, Board of Directors, Bot, Chairman of the Board, Clos du Bois, Constellation Brands, Corona Extra, Dancing Machine, Estancia, Fembot, H-D, Harley, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Jackson 5, Jackson Triggs, Keith E. Wandell, Kim Crawford, NYSE: STZ, Ravenswood, Richard Sands, Robert Mondavi, Robot, Scott Spock, SVEDKA Grl, Vodka on July 26, 2011|
													1 Comment » 


Elevate your lifestyle with another glass…
It might become the new Harley-Davidson slogan as Keith E. Wandell (H-D CEO) recently joined the board of directors for Constellation Brands.
Constant who?
Constellation Brands (NYSE: STZ) is a Fortune 1000 company with more than 100 brands in their portfolio, sales in about 125 countries and operations in approximately 30 facilities.  They are the world’s leading premium wine company with a broad portfolio of products across the wine, beer and spirits categories.   Constellation’s brand portfolio includes Robert Mondavi, Clos du Bois, Blackstone, Arbor Mist, Estancia, Ravenswood, Jackson Triggs, Kim Crawford, Corona Extra, Black Velvet Canadian Whisky and SVEDKA Vodka.
I can see a new marketing campaign now… the flirtatious, and witty pin-up bot from the future where there are no boundaries… SVEDKA Girl Grl.  You know her as the fembot of the future.  The world’s leading heavy cruiser motorcycle company joining together in a hip-hop nightlife where denizens do the “bot” dance… a version of “Dancing Machine” by the Jackson 5 (remixed by Scott Spock).  There will likely be posters and t-shirt giveaway’s with the sensual female robot standing astride a V-Rod… doing that super model burnout gig?!  Watch out Marisa Miller.  Your days are numbered!  Clearly merchandise tie-ins will be planned, scheduled and be most prolific.
In a company press release accolades oozed… “We are very pleased to welcome Keith to the board of directors and believe his experience in a diversified, consumer-driven industry, will provide excellent guidance as Constellation continues to focus on building its premium wine and spirits brands,” said Constellation’s Chairman of the Board, Richard Sands. “We look forward to the contributions he will make to the organization.”
The editor of this blog wasn’t solicited for an opinion, however, had it been it would have went something like… “I think it’s important to not confine yourself to society’s stereotypes.  It’s radical to see H-D embrace every aspect of the robot future.  First in displacing manufacturing workers to potentially no real people in advertising.  No one owns the future so why can’t a fembot ride!”
Look for my interview with the SVEDKA Grl soon.
Photo remix courtesy of Constellation and H-D.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson Q2’11 Financials

					Posted in 2011 Models, 2012 Models, Brand, Clothing, Dealer News, Earnings, Events, Harley, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, Products, tagged $1.51B, $190.6M, 1% Price Increase, 103 cu in, 2012, 2012 Models, 53.8 % MSS, 96 cu in, American Innovation, automatic compression release, Bike Builder Process, Booyah, Brand, CFO, Chief Financial Officer, Conventional Thinking, Financial, H-D, H-D1™, Harley, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Innovation, Japan, John Olin, Keith E. Wandell, Latin America, Lean Engineering, Mediocrity, Milwaukee, Motorcycle, Motorcycle shipments, motorcycles, New Products, Paint Palette, Product Development, Product Launch, Q2 2011, Q2'11, Road King, Sportster, Supply Chain, SwitchBack, Touring, Touring Models, Trike on July 19, 2011|
													2 Comments » 


H-D announced Q2’11 financial results this morning.
In a word – Booyah!
By every financial measure Harley-Davidson generated improvements in the second quarter of 2011, with strong earnings growth, increased shipments and growth in its dealers’ new motorcycle sales both in the U.S. and globally.  Here are some of the stats that CEO Keith Wandell and CFO John Olin reviewed from Anaheim, CA. where the annual dealer meeting and new product launch was in progress:

Revenue in Q2’11 was $1.51B (up 15%) with income up 36.8% to $190.6M
Motorcycle shipments up 7,769 in Q2’11 vs. Q2’10; Motorcycle segment revenue up $204.6M (18%) vs. Q2’10
Touring motorcycle shipments made up 38.3% in Q2’11; up 3.6%
International shipments were 36.2% in Q2’11 vs. Q2’10 at 42.5%
Shipment forecast for 2011 rose by about 8% and now H-D expects to ship between 228,000 and 235,000 motorcycles worldwide
Market segment share (651+cc) is 53.8%; up 0.2% from 2010
U.S. dealer network sales of uses motorcycles up 11% through May; Used bikes sales continue to firm up (meaning they offer the dealer a method to help offset the “sticker shock” of new bikes)

Did anything go less positive?  Well that depends on your viewpoint.  From a shareholder’s perspective it’s “Houston, we’re ready to throttle up”!   Stock price set a new 52-week high at $46.88.
As a rider/layman the touring motorcycle shipment increases were offset by the decreases in Custom and Sportster declines.  There were no age demographics quoted in the analyst call, but we’ve been told that typically “youngsters” don’t buy the higher priced baggers.  In addition, the new 2012 touring models that were announced earlier in the month have… shall we say… “lean” engineering innovation compared to previous years.  In a number of cases there we’re only paint palette changes and price increases made up the so-called “new” touring models.  There was about a 1% price increase in the U.S. market.  The lack of innovation is especially troubling (to me) given that product development spending was up $7M in the first half of 2011 which was described as a continuation of their strategy and focus on leaner engineering.  Sure metals and fuel costs are up, but the lack of stronger product changes is not always a recipe for long term success.
Nothing was noted on the call about the recent expansion in India.  Not sure why given that SG&A expenses were up about $13M on the strategy to grow 100 – 150 international dealers by 2014.  Latin America saw a decrease in retail sales which was largely due to all Brazil dealers being terminated.  There was a restart in that country and the new dealers (6) were coming up to speed.
Congrats to H-D on a great quarter!
UPDATE: Full transcript of the analyst call is HERE courtesy of SeekingAlpha.
Photo courtesy of H-D.  Full Disclosure: I don’t own H-D stock
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson’s SwitchBack

					Posted in 2012 Models, Dealer News, Earnings, Harley, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, Products, tagged 10th Anniversary V-Rod, 2012, 2012 Models, California Environmental Protection Agency/Air Resources Board, CARB, CEO, Cyril Huze Blog, Early Release, Harley-Davidson, Keith E. Wandell, Models, motorcycles, Product Development, Softail Cross Bones, Softail Rocker, Street Glide Trike, SwitchBack, water cooled V-twins on June 22, 2011|
													3 Comments » 


A yet to be announced new 2012 model from Harley-Davidson was inadvertently released to the public by the California Environmental Protection Agency/Air Resources Board.  No details have been released or provided by the Motor Company, but according to CARB’s online listing of 2012 H-D models that the agency approved the new models show up HERE.
If the information is complete it looks like three motorcycles are being discontinued (Softail Cross Bones, Softail Rocker and Street Glide Trike).  There are additional models getting the 103 cu inch and the new “SwitchBack” which is getting its name for the ability to be switched back and forth from touring to non-touring.  Isn’t that the same as a convertible which has been out for 3 years now?  There is also what looks to be a new 10th Anniversary V-Rod model.
Water Cooled V-Twin
It might be premature on my part, but these new models don’t look like a major transformation underway in product development.  It looks more like a really big yawn vs. true innovation.  The fact that Keith E. Wandell (President and CEO), a position he has held since May 2009 has pontificated in every earnings call about the new direction for Harley-Davidson through the development and implementation of a strategic plan based on the core tenets of growth, continuous improvement, leadership development and sustainability…. which includes expansion of the company’s global reach and product development transformations along with manufacturing capabilities for improved responsiveness is lacking.  I’ll reserve final judgment until the actual 2012 release at the end of July, but at this point I find myself asking is “SwitchBack” code word for a return to the old axiom…if it sticks out chrome it, if breaks make it bigger and if it’s ugly paint it black?!
And speaking of innovation, check out this link to Cyril Huze’s blog about a water cooled patent that H-D filed over a year ago… it seems to have resurrected a worldwide discussion on when will water cooled V-twins finally hit the market.  Obviously not in 2012, but maybe in 2013?
UPDATE: June 30, 2011 – Partial release of the new 2012 models occurred about a month early.  See URL HERE.
UPDATE: July 20,2011 – The H-D “SwitchBack” was rolled out at the Anaheim, CA., dealer meeting this morning and the web site is now live HERE.
Photo courtesy of CARB and ICB
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Hope, Change and Invest

					Posted in Brand, Dealer News, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Products, tagged 2010 Annual Results, CEO, Earnings, Earnings Call, Earnings Report, H-D, Harley, Harley-Davidson, HD, Keith E. Wandell, Obama’s State of the Union Address, Q4, Q4 2010, transforming labor agreements on January 27, 2011|
													Leave a Comment » 


CEO, Keith E. Wandell
I’m not talking about Obama’s State of the Union address.  Unfortunately I missed that opportunity to talk back to the TV with his long speech about “investment” plans in education, technology, roads and public sector workers.
Rather, my title reference is about Harley-Davidson (NYSE: HOG) who reported fourth-quarter earnings, a loss from operations of $42.1M, or $0.18 per share, which includes the impact of a one-time, $85.2M charge from the Company’s early repurchase of senior unsecured notes during the quarter.  H-D also reported better news on the full-year 2010 income of $259.7M, or $1.11 per share, compared to income of $70.6M, or $0.30 per share, in 2009.
Mr. Wandell (CEO) stated the company faces “significant challenges” ahead as it tries to navigate the changing economic landscape marred by 9%+ unemployment and worsening home foreclosure rates.  All of this underlines the challenges awaiting H-D in 2011 as it seeks to compete.  H-D management hopes the economy will improve, they’ve changed about all they can to manage down factory shipments and invested in workers by way of transforming labor agreements.
For the 2010 year, H-D shipped 210,494 motorcycles, in line with its target range of 207,000 to 212,000 motorcycles. Full-year shipments were 5.6% lower than 2009, when the Company shipped 223,023 units. Revenue from Harley-Davidson motorcycles for the full year was $3.14 billion, a 1.2 percent decrease compared to 2009. In contrast the full year 2009 compared to 2008, motorcycle retail sales decreased 22.7% worldwide, 25.8% in the U.S. and 15.4% in international markets.
The full transcript of the earnings call can be found HERE.
Photo courtesy of H-D Annual Report.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




‘Twas The Night Before At Harley

					Posted in Harley-Davidson, Motorcycle, tagged Bill Davidson, CEO, Curator Bill, Enrico, H-D, Harley-Davidson, HD, Joanne, Joanne Bishmann, Keith E. Wandell, Mark-Hans Richer, Miller Park, Night Before Christmas, Snow Sculpting, Tom Queoff, Tomahawk on December 24, 2010|
													Leave a Comment » 



This holiday season I want to thank all of you for your continued support and wish you a Merry Christmas and a happy New Years!
Below is a little poem I crafted for the Harley team…
December 24, 2010
‘Twas the night before Christmas, when all through the Harley house,
Not a manager was stirring, not even a supervisor mouse;
Annual reviews were hung by the HR door with care,
In hopes year-end bonuses soon would be there.
Directors nestled all snug in their beds,
While dreams of promotion danced in their heads;
Ms. Tonit in snowflake sweater, and me in my suspenders,
We’d just settled down to write our year-enders,
When from the 3rd floor there came such a clatter,
I sprang from my desk to attend to the matter.
Clutching my iPhone I flew up the stairs,
Wondering what marketing-caused mayhem I might find there.
With the moon high above the Tomahawk facility
It cast a glow over Financial Services Billing & Eligibility,
When, what to my wondering eyes should appear,
But a medium-height chap looking quite cavalier.
That glass in his hand, so clearly a Red Zinfandel,
I knew in a moment: Keith E. Wandell!
More rapid than eagles his lieutenants they came,
As he whistled, and shouted, and called them by name;
“Now Dasher, Now Dancer, & you Curator Bill,
On Joanne! On Mark-Hans! On Enrico! You work here, still?”
“Into my office! At the end of the hall!
Now dash away! dash away! dash away all!”
Up they lined, like toy soldiers taking up residence,
It was a small army of regular and senior vice presidents.
And then Keith began banging on his shiny new laptop,
“Yes, Friday’s are Casual Day, but this plant absenteeism has to stop.”
I spoke not a word, and was turning around,
When out of his black-and-orange chair the boss came with a bound.
His eyes — how they twinkled! And this I must, say
His cheeks were like roses, all red like a football fan on a cold Packers day!
His Holiday necktie drawn up tight like a bow,
And the bald of his head was as white as the snow;
He had a broad face and the Harley t-shirt showed a little CEO belly,
That shook, when he laughed like a bowlful of jelly.
He wasn’t chubby nor plump, just a jolly old elf,
And I smiled when I saw him, in spite of everyone else;
A wink of his eye and a nod of his head,
Soon let us know that H-D VP’s had nothing to dread;
 
He spoke not a word, but with fingers quite soft,
He started filling envelopes so fast it made him cough,
And laying a finger aside of his nose,
He gave a wave and twist, down the elevator he goes; 
He sprang up on his motorcycle sidecar, to his team gave a shout,
“To Miller Park!” he cried, it’s time to chill out.”
And I heard him exclaim, as he throttled away,
“I have envelopes for all and for all, have a great Harley ridin’ day!”
Photo courtesy of Tom Queoff (USA Snow Sculpting Team)
 
 
 
 

All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog

 
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Thinking Snow And Wishful Drinking

					Posted in 2010 Models, Dealer News, Earnings, Events, Harley, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, tagged 1972-1974, 2010, Absenteeism, AMF, Bill Davidson, Brand, Brand Loyalty, Brand Value, Buell, Carmichael Lynch, Classic Ad, Comparisons to GM, Crowd Sourcing, Earnings, Facebook, Federal Reserve, H-D, H-D Museum, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson Hyderabad, HD, Keith E. Wandell, Mark-Hans Richer, marketing, MV Agusta, National Law Enforcement Museum, Seth Enslow, sidecar, Snow, Snowmobile, Super Ride II, Tax Credits, Think Snow Ad, Wisconsin State, Year in Review on December 20, 2010|
													Leave a Comment » 


Think Snow Bumpersticker - HD Advertising (circa: 1972-74)
It was a big year for Harley-Davidson as they shifted from downsizing, labor agreements and weathering the recession to now looking forward to growth in 2011.  With freezing temperature and snow falling in many parts of the U.S., I’ve compiled some 2010 highlights to provide you some entertainment as you warm up with hot chocolate:
January
1.    Downtown H-D Renton, WA., one of the northwest dealers named among top 100 (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D reported its first quarterly loss since 1993 (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D announces the new, but “old” Forty-Eight Sportster (Link: HERE)
February
1.    H-D donates 28 new Buell and H-D motorcycles to assist in the earthquake disaster (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D marketing continues to pitch brand with young-rebel-with-tats ethos (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D internal documents indicate 382,000 absenteeism hours in the factories (Link: HERE)
March
1.    H-D promotes danger as Seth Enslow breaks Bubba Blackwell’s jump record (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D dealer (Shumate) in Kennewick, WA., closes under a mountain of debt. (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D CEO, Keith E. Wandell 2009 compensation package becomes public as the $6M dollar man (Link: HERE)
4.    H-D marketing pulls out all stops on innovation and launches Super Ride II (Link: HERE)
April
1.    H-D consolidates motorcycle testing in Arizona Proving Grounds (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D files mass layoff notice with Wisconsin department of workforce development (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D CEO, Keith E. Wandell is “encouraged” as Q1 motorcycle sales revenue declines 20% YOY (Link: HERE)
4.    After 26 years of service Bill Davidson is put in charge of the Museum (Link: HERE)
May
1.    H-D CEO, Keith E. Wandell states in interview that H-D is like GM…a fading American industrial might (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D threatens to leave the state of Wisconsin (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D CMO, Mark-Hans Richer is no man crush of this blog (Link: HERE)
June
1.    H-D launches XR1200 Refresh (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D launches Wii based-game: “Road Trip” (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D at the National Law Enforcement Museum (Link: HERE)
July
1.    H-D opens Hyderabad, India showroom to pandemonium (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D reports Q2 earnings with financial services being largest money maker (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D launches the 2011 model lineup of 32 bikes vs. 38 the prior year (Link: HERE)
August
1.    H-D announces closure of sidecar business which operated since 1914 (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D announces 1-MILLION fans on Facebook (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D sold back MV Agusta to its previous owners (Link: HERE)
4.    H-D announces that after 31 years they’ve parted ways with PR firm Carmichael Lynch (Link: HERE)
September
1.    Erik Buell releases teaser ads promoting a new street bike based on 1190RR (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D gives away free posters of any of their 32 models (Link: HERE)
3.    H-D under threat of moving out of state announces ratified 7-year labor agreement (Link: HERE)
4.    H-D “spins” the fact that massive branding efforts result in a 24% brand value decline (Link: HERE)
October
1.    H-D reports Q3 earnings with motorcycle sales declining 7.7% worldwide and 14.4% in the U.S. (Link: HERE)
November
1.    H-D management “negotiates” with Kansas City plant to accept a new labor agreement or we’ll leave state (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D turns down a $25M tax credit deal by Wisconsin State (Link: HERE)
December
1.    H-D never disclosed a $2.3 BILLION deal with Federal Reserve (Link: HERE)
2.    H-D announces first ever “Crowd Sourcing” for new marketing ideas (Link: HERE)
Photo courtesy of H-D.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »


« Newer Posts - Older Posts »




July 2017


S
M
T
W
T
F
S




« Jun
 
 




 1


2345678


9101112131415


16171819202122


23242526272829


3031
 


Archives Archives

Select Month
 June 2017  (4)
 May 2017  (5)
 April 2017  (6)
 March 2017  (2)
 February 2017  (1)
 January 2017  (1)
 November 2016  (1)
 October 2016  (1)
 September 2016  (2)
 August 2016  (7)
 July 2016  (12)
 September 2015  (1)
 August 2015  (2)
 July 2015  (4)
 June 2015  (5)
 May 2015  (1)
 February 2015  (2)
 January 2015  (1)
 December 2014  (4)
 November 2014  (2)
 October 2014  (4)
 September 2014  (4)
 August 2014  (9)
 July 2014  (14)
 June 2014  (11)
 May 2014  (12)
 April 2014  (2)
 March 2014  (1)
 February 2014  (8)
 January 2014  (7)
 December 2013  (3)
 November 2013  (6)
 October 2013  (5)
 September 2013  (7)
 August 2013  (7)
 July 2013  (9)
 June 2013  (16)
 May 2013  (12)
 April 2013  (5)
 March 2013  (8)
 February 2013  (7)
 January 2013  (6)
 December 2012  (6)
 November 2012  (6)
 October 2012  (10)
 September 2012  (12)
 June 2012  (8)
 May 2012  (9)
 April 2012  (6)
 March 2012  (9)
 February 2012  (3)
 January 2012  (7)
 December 2011  (9)
 November 2011  (3)
 October 2011  (6)
 September 2011  (6)
 August 2011  (5)
 July 2011  (6)
 June 2011  (9)
 May 2011  (13)
 April 2011  (7)
 March 2011  (12)
 February 2011  (16)
 January 2011  (5)
 December 2010  (12)
 November 2010  (4)
 October 2010  (12)
 September 2010  (15)
 August 2010  (14)
 July 2010  (21)
 June 2010  (17)
 May 2010  (10)
 April 2010  (20)
 March 2010  (17)
 February 2010  (21)
 January 2010  (11)
 December 2009  (17)
 November 2009  (14)
 October 2009  (7)
 September 2009  (26)
 August 2009  (25)
 July 2009  (24)
 June 2009  (26)
 May 2009  (19)
 April 2009  (19)
 March 2009  (24)
 February 2009  (18)
 January 2009  (26)
 December 2008  (25)
 November 2008  (21)
 October 2008  (43)
 September 2008  (35)
 August 2008  (28)
 July 2008  (18)
 June 2008  (13)
 May 2008  (17)
 April 2008  (14)
 March 2008  (6)
 February 2008  (6)
 January 2008  (12)
 December 2007  (5)
 November 2007  (8)
 October 2007  (17)
 September 2007  (3)
 August 2007  (12)
 July 2007  (10)

Top Posts 

						Outlaw Motorcycle Gangs Flying Colors in Oregon					



						Lewis And Clark Touring Rally - 2017					



						Harley Crotch Rocket - XR1200					



						UPDATED: April 24, 2017 -- Added a tab "Engine His…					



						The Pendleton Bike Week - Success And Tragedy					

HOG Photos


 

			More Photos		


1%
105th
105th Anniversary
110th Anniversary
2009
2010
ABATE
Accidents
Ads
Advertising
Age
Baker City
BMW
Brand
Buell
CEO
Earnings
Economy
Event
Events
FX
H-D
HAMC
Harley
Harley-Davidson
HD
Hells Angels
Hells Canyon Motorcycle Rally
HOG
Honda
Idaho
Indian
Keith E. Wandell
Keith Wandell
Las Vegas
Laughlin
Laughlin River Run
Legal
Legislation
Leo
Mark-Hans Richer
marketing
Milwaukee
Motorcycle
motorcycles
Music
Nevada
NHTSA
NV
ODOT
OMG
OR
Oregon
OSP
Portland
President
Project RUSHMORE
Rally
Recall
Reno
Ride Home
Road Glide
Road Trip
Safety
Sales
SD
SOA
Sons of Anarchy
South Dakota
Street Vibrations
Sturgis
Travel
Vets
WA
YamahaNWHog Comments 
Gary on Dancing With The Heat Dra…Héctor Hugo Ojeda Oy… on Las Vegas 40th Anniversar…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson… on CEO’s That Made Har…CEO’s That Mad… on Woody Farewell For Harley-Davi…CEO’s That Mad… on Go Italian 
Blog Stats 
1,953,298 hits

105th Anniversary

It’s Time Ride


110th Anniversary

The Rumble Heard 'Round The World


Builders

Big Dog Cycles
C-51 Customs
Choppahead Custom Cycles
Choppers Inc.
Cro Customs
Cyril Huze Customs
Exile Cycles
Guilty Customs
Harley Restoration
Hippy Killer Garage
HOG Killers
Kendall Johnson Customs
Kickass Choppers
Klock Werks Cycles
OCC
Paul Yaffe Cycles
Phil’s Chopper Shack
Power Plant Choppers
Salinas Boys Choppers
Shinya Kimura
Sucker Punch Sallys
Vintage Twin
Walt Siegl Customs
West Coast Choppers
Wild West Customs


Clothing

415 Clothing
Black Kat Kustoms
Glory
GuyQGoods
Jamin Leather
Langlitz Leathers
Lollipop Lingerie
Lucky 13


Clubs

Desert Riders MC
Iron Pigs
Oregon Scooters
Oregon Vintage Motorcyclists
Rose City Motorcycle Club
Sunset HOG Chapter


Events

Arizona Bike Week
Laughlin River Run
Rolling Thunder Rally
Street Vibrations
Sturgis Rally


Female Riders

I Ride My Own
The Moto Lady


Forums

Harley-Davidson
HD Forum
J&P Cycle
Motorcycle
Motorcycle USA
V-Twin
Victory
Yamaha


Hot Links

Hot Pics


Latest News

Clutch and Chrome
Cycle Source Magazine
DicE Magazine
Gangsters Out
HOG Radio
IronWorks Magazine
Motorcycle Books
OSP News Releases
Police Accident Flash Alert
Police Misconduct
Thunder Press


Organizations

A.B.A.T.E
Abu Dhabi H.O.G.
American Motorcyclist Assn.
BikePAC of Oregon
Bikers For Christ
DOJ
H.O.G
Honor and Remember
Iron Butt Association
Ride To Work
Road Glide Org


Other Harley Blogs

Arizona Harley Dude
Big Money Blog
Cyril Huze Blog
Dave Dragon Blog
Gary S France
Harley Forums
Henshaw Hog Blog
Iowa Harley Girl
IronWorks
LimpNickie
Maniac Muddy Tires Blog
Motorcycle Philosophy Blog
Ms M’s
Road Captain USA
Road King UK
Road-Quest
Swags Rant
Travelin'gringo
Upright Motorcycle Brigade
V-Twin Motorcycle Blog
Women Motorcyclist
WWGinger Blog


Products

Biker at Home
Clutch & Chrome
Custom Chrome
Ducati
Gremlin Bells
H-D Challenger Coins
Harley-Davidson
Honda Motorcycles
JP Cycles
K & G Motorcycle Parts
Kawasaki
Kuryakyn
Leather Up
Maniac Muddy Tires Blog
Motorcycle Calendars
Motorcycle Fairing
OilBud™
Paradise Harley-Davidson
Performance Machine
Refueled Magazine
Renegade Wheels
Slick Customs
Theobald Leather
Triumph
Vance & Hines
Vespa
Victory
Welding Supply
Yamaha


Routes & Maps

Best Biking Roads
ByWays
Greatest Road
Harley Route Planner
Idaho Byways
My Scenic Drives
Oregon Byways
Oregon Weather
Road-Quest
Roads Northwest
Sunday Morning Rides
Travel Oregon
Trip Check


Safety

Motorcyle Safety Foundation


Saloon's

Broken Spoke
Wankers Corner


Transportation

KGM Motorcycle Transport


Meta 
Register Log in
Entries RSS
Comments RSS
WordPress.com 


Search for:



Follow me on TwitterMy Tweets





Create a free website or blog at WordPress.com.
WPThemes.



















						Northwest Harley Blog					


Blog at WordPress.com. 





Post to



Cancel







 










 



		Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies from WordPress.com and selected partners. To find out more, as well as how to remove or block these, see here: Our Cookie Policy













 
 
%d bloggers like this:









































































































































Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell | Northwest Harley Blog




































Home
About
Engine History
Events
Packing List
Safety






Northwest Harley Blog
Whatever it is, it's better in the wind…



Feeds:
Posts
Comments






Posts Tagged ‘Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell’


Top 10 Harley-Davidson Executive Quotes

					Posted in Brand, Harley-Davidson, Motorcycle, tagged Brian Nelson, CEO Keith Wandell, Chairman of the Board, CMO, Come Together Ad, General Manager of Motorcycle New Product Delivery, H-D, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Keith E. Wandell, Looks Ridiculous, Mark-Hans Richer, marketing, Memorable Quotes, Project RUSHMORE, Ridiculous Quotes, Tony Wilcox, Top 10, Top 10 List on December 30, 2013|
													Leave a Comment » 


It’s that time of year when folks are getting ready to ring in the New Year and its customary to provide a Top 10 list.
I decided to pull together a nostalgic list of some of the more ridiculous Harley-Davidson executive quotes.  There are some doozies and it makes a person wonder if they were cocktail chatter or actually written down and prepped by the PR team.  Honestly, it was difficult to narrow it down to just ten, but here they are: 

“I would be really upset if you felt our strategy was about “meeting the nicest people on a Harley” because I can tell you that ain’t the strategy…” Harley CMO Mark-Hans Richer (Source: HERE)

“These new bikes are leaner, yet still have a mean streak – they’re the real deal, made of real steel.” Harley CMO Mark-Hans Richer (Source: HERE)

Little did we know we were doing a cross-promotion with God.” Harley CMO Mark-Hans Richer (Source: HERE)
“‘Come Together’ is not merely a song in our [advert] spot – it’s an anthem for our relationship with our fans.” Harley CMO Mark-Hans Richer (Source: HERE)

“We don’t do trend bikes, or fashion-statement motorcycles. We try to make something that will last forever.” **Brian Nelson, lead stylist on Project RUSHMORE  (Source: HERE)

“I couldn’t care less if I ever wore a tie again.” Harley Chairman of the Board, president and CEO Keith Wandell  (Source: HERE)

“None of us get up every morning and want to make people’s lives miserable and see people lose their jobs. If you think that’s the case, I apologize.”  Harley Chairman of the Board, president and CEO Keith Wandell  (Source: HERE)

“We can’t survive on our core customers alone.” Harley Chairman of the Board, president and CEO Keith Wandell (Source: HERE)

“The safety of our customers is our highest priority,” Harley General Manager of Motorcycle New Product Delivery Tony Wilcox (Source: HERE)

“We think it’s a dichotomy” Harley Chairman of the Board, president and CEO Keith Wandell (Source: HERE)


There it is.  Do you have any memorable quotes to add to the list?
**Note: Mr. Nelson (#5) is not a company executive.
Photo courtesy of Sam Churchill.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson And The “The King of Good Times”

					Posted in 2014 Models, Advertising, Boomers, Brand, Brand Loyalty, Buell, Dealer News, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, Products, tagged Baby Boomers, Bawal India, beer, Brazil, Buell, Buell Blast, Buell Blast ReDeux, Buell Ulysses, H-D, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, India, Italy, Keith Wandell, Kingfisher "The King of Good Times", MV, Non-Caucasian Men, Project RUSHMORE, Street 500, Street 750, Women on November 7, 2013|
													Leave a Comment » 


I’m talking about Kingfisher.
Beer was introduced into India by the British, who eventually set up a brewery that produced Asia’s first beer — a pale ale called Lion. However, these days, lager is the only type of beer you’ll find available in India and “The King of Good Times” is Kingfisher.
It’s India’s most recognized and widely available beer. Its name has been associated with sports, fashion, and even an airline.
And sooner than anyone would have thought… in Bawal, India a Harley-Davidson assembly line worker will be having a Kingfisher and relaxing with co-workers.
But, I’ve gotten ahead of myself…  let’s jump into the the way back machine and set the dial for — 2009.
“The fact is we must focus both our effort and our investment on the Harley-Davidson brand, as we believe this provides an optimal path to sustained, meaningful long-term growth,” said CEO Keith Wandell at the October 15, 2009 announcement to discontinue production of Buell motorcycles.  On October 30, 2009 the last Buell (Lightning XB12Scg) rolled off the company’s East Troy, Wisconsin. assembly line.  It was the last of the 136,923 motorcycles built in the company’s 26 years of operation.
Harley-Davidson Street 750
It was a combination of factors in making the decision, but essentially the global recession forced a reckoning and Harley-Davidson decided to refocus on its tent pole products or what I’d call doubling down on its core lineup of heavyweight bikes.  As a result, the motor company abandoned entry level motorcycles (Buell Blast), exited the sport bike (Buell and sold MV) and thumb their noses at the adventure market (Buell Ulysses).   In the process the motor company made a lot of motorcycle enthusiasts upset about what looked like a myopic approach of only looking at spreadsheets versus doing a bit more market research and addressing a need.
Jump ahead 4-years and witness the financial rebound of the company and the launch this week of the new Harley-Davidson Street 750 and Street 500 motorcycles.  Could it be a Buell Blast ReDeux?  The smaller 500cc motorcycle basically fills a void left when they discontinued the Buell motorcycle line which included the 492cc Buell Blast.  More important in this announcement is the fact that the motorcycles will be made both in the U.S. and Bawal, India, marking the first time the company will manufacture a complete motorcycle at an overseas facility.  I’ll repeat that… the first time the company will manufacture a complete motorcycle outside the U.S.!
Harley-Davidson Street 750 (Side View)
The manufacturing news in of itself will be fodder for many future blog posts, but sticking to the motorcycle announcement, the new ‘Street’ bikes are the first Harley-Davidson motorcycles to be designed from scratch since the V-Rod 13 years ago.
It makes this Road Glide owner wonder if that’s an indicator of where all the engineers were redirected in lieu of updating the ‘Glide’ with the all new Project RUSHMORE features that were incorporated into the new 2014 touring models?
The fact is the company has aggressively expanded its marketing efforts because realistically, there is no replacing white Baby Boomer men. And this means they have to attract younger men, non-Caucasian men, women, and do that from countries as disparate as India, Italy, Brazil and the U.S. with much more success.  By turning inwards, relying on a single-brand tradition and nationalism over the last 4-years and divesting itself of brands that were dimming the lights on a brighter future–the motor company can and now has expanded into other segments.
At the Street 750/500 announcement the Harley-Davidson, CEO Keith Wandell said, “The younger riders don’t want their dad’s chromed-out Harley,” “They want the Dark Custom, sinister look, the ability to rebel.”
Sounds like a bit of marketing spin, but with more than half of its dealerships outside the U.S., Harley-Davidson has really put a lot of investment behind a push to expand and broaden its customer base including new motorcycle buyers–worldwide.
Photo’s courtesy of H-D and Kingfisher.  Note: Kingfisher, “The King of Good Times”, is India’s most recognized and widely available beer. Its name has been associated with sports, fashion, and even an airline.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson Is Rockin’ The Free World

					Posted in 2013 Models, Brand, Dealer News, Earnings, Harley, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, Products, tagged 104 dealerships outside the U.S., 110th Anniversary, Ayatollah Khomeini, Craig Kennison, H-D, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, Harley-Davidson Q2’13 Financial, HD, Keep On Rockin’ In The Free World, Keith E. Wandell, Neil Young, Net Income $271.7M, No Road Glide models in 2014, Pancho Sampedro, Revenue $1.79 Billion, Rockin’ The Free World, Sold 90193 motorcycles, U.S. (Heavyweight) market share 53.0%, US sold 58241 motorcycles on July 25, 2013|
													Leave a Comment » 


Neil Young wrote the song Keep On Rockin’ In The Free World in 1989.
Neil and a member of his band, Pancho Sampedro, were glancing at newspaper photographs on the funeral of Ayatollah Khomeini in Iran as the angry mob set America flags on fire and chanted death to America.  Sampedro commented, “Whatever we do, we shouldn’t go near the Mideast.  It’s probably better that we just keep on rockin’ the free world.”
And speaking of rockin’… listening in on the HOG Q2’13 financial call today felt upbeat with a positive vibe.  Sure there was plenty of financial mumbo jumbo, but every profession has its buzzwords to create the illusion that things are more complex than they really are.
Here are the Q2’13 financial highlights:

Consolidated revenue of $1.79 Billion
Net income was $271.7 Million
Diluted earnings per share were $1.21
Added 104 dealerships outside the U.S. since late 2009; the latest was Salvador, Brazil.
With nearly 1500 dealers worldwide H-D sold 90,193 motorcycles
U.S., dealers sold 58,241 motorcycles
In international markets, dealers sold 31,952 motorcycles
Through 6-months, net income was $495.9 Million on consolidated revenue of $3.37 Billion
U.S. (Heavyweight) market share increased to 53.0%
Completed its first year of seasonal surge production at its plant in Springettsbury Township
For the 1H, H-D mostly attributes cool, damp weather — not the economy — to a 2.7 percent drop in U.S. bike sales.
Supply and demand are back in balance… read that as an opportunity to raise model prices again!
First corporate confirmation there will be no Road Glide models in the new 2014 model year as they retool and refresh the model
60 bands over 3-days at the 110th Anniversary celebration in Milwaukee

The most interesting question?
It came from Craig Kennison (Baird & Co.) – “Did you ask the Pope to pray for better weather?”  I liked the snarky question which was in reference to the fact that H-D attributes cool, damp weather — not the economy — to a 2.7 percent drop in U.S. bike sales and being somewhat of a drag on H-D parts and accessories.  If you don’t ride you don’t need to do much motorcycle service or buy parts.
In conclusion and more important to all the riders, the company remains on track to announce its 2014 model year bikes in the 3rd week of August.
Photo courtesy of H-D/Google.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson Reverses Decision To Shutter Adaelaid Plant

					Posted in 2013 Models, Earnings, Events, Harley, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, Products, tagged Adaelaid Plant, Adelaide-based, Australia, Australian subsidiary New Castalloy, Australian Workers Union State Secretary, Australian Workers Union State Secretary Wayne Hanson, China, Dylan Coker, Edward Fern, Harley, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, Ion, Layoff, Made cheaper in China, Made In China, Manufacturing, Martin Parker, Michael Tamasi, New Castalloy, President and Chief Operating Officer Matt Levatich, Pride, South Australian Employment Minister Tom Kenyon, South Australian Trade Minister Tom Koutsantonis, Workers on July 10, 2013|
													2 Comments » 


New Castalloy workers Martin Parker, Edward Fern and Michael Tamasi celebrate the news.
I blogged back in December 2011 (HERE) that Harley-Davidson made a decision to shift wheel and hub manufacturing from Adelaide-based New Castalloy to China.
The plant was set for closure by mid-2013.
This news hit the Australian Workers Union State Secretary and union workers just prior to the Christmas holiday and resulted in some name calling and bad blood with the motor company.
Jump ahead a 1.5 years and New Castalloy had shed approximately 90 of the 212 workers, but there was some good news this week!  Harley-Davidson reversed the decision to shutter the plant and struck a 4-year deal, on both an extension to the plant’s lease and a new wage-agreement were obtained.
It would seem logical to assume that New Castalloy greatly improved its cost structure as they are now viewed as competitive at producing low-volume, high finish wheels.  The Australian government, which owns the Mooringe Ave. plant waived rent at the site to help secure the deal.
Congrats!  I’m sure the nice folks in Adaelaid feel good knowing they’ll continue to help H-D riders around the world express their own style of freedom.
Photo courtesy of Dylan Coker.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Artic Oscillation Blamed For Harley-Davidson’s Sales Decline

					Posted in Dealer News, Earnings, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, tagged 110th, 110th Anniversary, CEO, Cold Weather, Down 12.7%, Earnings, Earnings Report, H-D, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Keith E. Wandell, Q1'13, Revenue, Sales, Weather on April 30, 2013|
													1 Comment » 


You’re the CEO and going down your quarterly earnings check list:

Still in business after 110 years – Check
Secured music talent for 110th Anniversary Party – Check
Number one seller of motorcycles to young adults (18-34) – Check
Increase 2013 first quarter revenue to $1.57B (up 10%) vs. $1.43B a year earlier — Check
Increase 2013 first quarter income to $224.1M vs. $172M a year earlier – Check
HOG shares up 2.1% to closed at $54.31 – Check
U.S. dealers sold 34,706 new motorcycles, down 12.7% from a year earlier – Ooops!

Colder temperatures and the wet climate set the stage for the quarterly sales miss.  At least according to Harley-Davidson CEO, Keith Wandell who stated in last week’s earnings call… “By far, the vast majority of the (sales decline) was weather related”.
Interesting.  The earnings call didn’t signal any major marketing changes for the brand, instead pinning some of the losses on external factors such as rainfall in many parts of the country, the weak economy and the unseasonably cold weather.
Are the only unemployed consumers who keep getting rained on Harley-Davidson consumers?!
Generally speaking home sales and auto sales are up.  It would seem that management neglected to remind us about Superstorm Sandy, how federal tax returns have been delayed and how fuel prices are unsettling to consumers.  To be fair some retail outlets selling spring apparel, home and garden were depressed due to wintry conditions, but looking at the weather for an impact on Harley-Davidson consumer spending seems a bit trivial.
I spent the last week in Arizona and if you plotted temperatures from dawn until noon, you’d observe an alarming warming trend.  If you extended that trend line for the next 4-months, you’ll clearly notice that ice caps will melt and the poor polar bears will be swimming more.
We’ll soon know if the good weather in the upcoming quarter provides a recovery to more normalized sales volume.
Photo courtesy of NOAA
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




ERP Holds Harley-Davidson Q3 Earnings Hostage

					Posted in 2013 Models, Dealer News, Earnings, Harley, Harley Engines, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, tagged Dealer, Enterprise Resource Planning, ERP, Finance, Great Motorcycles, H-D, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, Inventory, Keith E. Wandell, Lame Slogan, MotorClothes, Motorcycle Sales, Operations, Q3 2012 Earnings, SAP AG, SAP’s Community Network on October 26, 2012|
													Leave a Comment » 


Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) was the watch word at Harley-Davidson’s Q3’12 earnings call earlier in the week.  So eloquent were the deflections it almost makes a person think they’re a SAP – for investing in SAP AG!

Harley-Davidson’s third-quarter earnings were income from continuing operations at $134.0 million on consolidated revenue of $1.25 billion, compared to income from continuing operations of $183.6 million, or $0.78 per share, on consolidated revenue of $1.40 billion in the year-ago quarter.
Through nine months, Harley-Davidson income from continuing operations increased 12.1 percent year-over-year to $553.3 million, or $2.40 per share, on consolidated revenue of $4.41 billion, compared to income from continuing operations of $493.4 million, or $2.09 per share, on consolidated revenue of $4.13 billion in the year-ago period.
“The third quarter marked a pivotal milestone in Harley-Davidson’s transformation. With the launch of the ERP production system at York, a major piece of our restructuring work is behind us. We are now focused on optimizing the system and look forward to the start of seasonal surge production early next year,” said Keith Wandell, Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer.
Like partners in a three-legged foot race, both the management and employees were hobbled by their connection to this so-called new ERP production system at the Company’s largest assembly plant.  How ironic.  A new production system being implemented to improve manufacturing performance becomes part of the problem that resulted in comments during the call like:

“Harley-Davidson’s annual new model launch was pushed to late August from late July.”
“New motorcycle sales were adversely affected by a limited availability of new motorcycles in July, August and early September.” 
And leaving no deflection rock unturned… “The economy remains fragile and there’s a lot of uncertainty for high-end products like a brand (Harley-Davidson) like ours.”
No mention in the call about the Milwaukee HQ IT jobs outsourced in July to India (Infosys) and if that had an impact on Q3?!
Nothing mention in the call whether what I feel has to be the lamest slogan (“Great Motorcycles”) on the 110th Anniversary models is creating sales issues.  It would be the first thing I’d take off the bike!

110th Anniversary Model with “Great Motorcycles” Slogan – Primary Cover
On a worldwide basis, dealers sold 61,053 new Harley-Davidson motorcycles in the third quarter of 2012 compared to 61,838 motorcycles sold in the year-ago period.  Dealers sold 40,402 new Harley-Davidson motorcycles in the U.S. compared to sales of 42,640 units in last year’s third quarter. In international markets, dealers sold 20,651 new Harley-Davidson motorcycles during the third quarter compared to sales of 19,198 units in the year-ago period.  During the quarter, retail unit sales increased 32.3 percent in the Latin America region, 9.8 percent in the Asia Pacific region and 1.8 percent in the EMEA region and decreased 4.7 percent in North America (U.S. and Canada) compared to last year’s third quarter.
Harley-Davidson Motorcycles and Related Products Segment Results Third-Quarter Results: Third-quarter operating income from motorcycles and related products was $144.8 million, a 19.9 percent decrease compared to operating income of $180.7 million in the year-ago period.
110th Anniversary Model with “Great Motorcycles” Slogan – Air Cleaner Cover
Revenue from motorcycles during the third quarter of 2012 of $774.0 million was down 16.1 percent compared to the year-ago period. The Company shipped 52,793 motorcycles to dealers and distributors worldwide during the quarter, down 14.5 percent and in line with prior guidance, compared to shipments of 61,745 motorcycles in the third quarter of 2011.
Revenue from motorcycle parts and accessories totaled $233.7 million during the quarter, down 0.8 percent, and revenue from general merchandise, which includes MotorClothes® apparel and accessories, was $75.6 million, up 9.1 percent compared to the year-ago period.
Gross margin was 34.7 percent in the third quarter of 2012, compared to 33.7 percent in the third quarter of 2011. Third-quarter operating margin from motorcycles and related products was 13.3 percent, compared to operating margin of 14.7 percent in last year’s third quarter.
For the full year 2012, Harley-Davidson continues to forecast a five-to seven-percent increase in motorcycle shipments compared to 2011.
My view is that they are not done transforming the company and it’s going to take more time to right the ship while getting the ERP humming to turn the management business vision into a reality.
Photo courtesy of SAP and H-D.
Note: In 2006 H-D selected SAP to help them manage and optimize their growth.  In June 2011, there was an article in Forbes referring to H-D involvement in SAP’s Community Network.  It’s unclear if the “new” ERP implementation is an updated rollout of a newer version of SAP or a major transition to new ERP vendor. 
Full Disclosure:  I have no investment in or hold any SAP AG or Harley-Davidson stock.
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »




Harley-Davidson CEO Salary Change Gesture

					Posted in Dealer News, Earnings, Harley, Harley-Davidson, Latest News, Motorcycle, Motorcycle Sales, tagged $7.2 million, Beverly Hills, CA, camouflage, CEO, Gesture, H-D, Harley, Harley success, Harley-Davidson, Harley-Davidson CEO Keith Wandell, HD, INDUSTRY SUCCESS, Keith Wandall, Motor Company, President, rich and famous, Route 66, ruse, Salary, Santa Monica, smokescreen, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, we’re all in it together on April 2, 2012|
													3 Comments » 


I was in L.A. last week driving down part of Route 66 towards the Santa Monica pier and through Beverly Hills enjoying the nice California  weather.
There were more yet-to-be licensed Benzes, Ferraris and Porsches over a three-mile stretch than I’ve seen in the past year.  And here I was in an ultra-cool Nissan Cube rental, arm out the window and for a few blocks co-mingling with the rich and famous.
Speaking of… did you read that the Harley-Davidson president and CEO, Keith Wandell, opted not to have his base salary increased in 2011, according to a proxy statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission.
On the surface this – “we’re all in it together” – grand gesture would make a person believe that a CEO who accepts a ZERO increase in salary is saying they’re a team player who wants to make a sacrifice for the good of the company.  After all wasn’t it Harley-Davidson management that laid-off hundreds of workers, closed plants and obtained impressive union concessions in a new multi-tiered workforce structure for the survival of the company?
Call me cynical, but when I hear about these it seems more like “camouflage” to deflect scrutiny off the extraordinary set of CEO benefits or at minimum to get publicity and produce significant positive short-term market reaction.
In fact, there are a number of reports which suggest these type of salary tactics are nothing but a ruse or smokescreen as a number of CEOs have adopted these pay schemes.  It’s the kind of opportunistic behavior from those wealthier, more confident, influential CEO’s rather than sacrificial acts they are ‘projected’ out to be.
I certainly don’t know if or what Mr. Wandell’s intent was, but we do know his total compensation in 2011 rose nearly 13% to about $7.2 million, compared with $6.4 million in 2010.  We also know the motor company paid Mr. Wandell a bonus of $365,639 in 2011.  He also received a base salary of $975,037 in 2011, equal to his salary in 2010.
And to be clear this post isn’t about wealth envy or whining about how it must be nice to be rich.  We all know that rich people and bankers are beating the system.  They’re writing off multi-thousand dollar meals with rare wines at places with unlisted phone numbers that you/I can’t get into.  Unless you just woke up in North Korea, then you know that in America, if you don’t like what you earn, where you work or what you do for a living then you’re entitled to leave (quit) and go start a company, further your education or do whatever the hell you want.  It’s clear that company’s exist to make a profit for their shareholders and if the shareholders don’t like what the CEO is doing, or earning then they can fire the board of directors to include the CEO.
But wait there’s even more.  Mr. Wandell received total cash bonus payments, both discretionary and performance-based, totaling more than $2.8 million in 2011, compared with cash bonus payments of about $2.3 million in 2010.  His stock awards were valued at $1.5 million, compared with $1.4 million in 2010, while his option awards were valued at $1.7 million, compared with $1.6 million the previous year.  He also received “other” compensation totaling about $175,000 in 2011, compared with about $84,000 in 2010. The payments included $29,600 in lieu of receiving certain perquisites and personal benefits, nonqualified deferred compensation plan contributions of $68,466, 401(k) plan contributions of $31,850, and life insurance premiums of $13,727. He also received additional benefits that totaled $25,478 consisting of financial planning services, personal use of company aircraft and clothing.
What’s the punch line?
Well given that Mr. Wandell has made things happen, meaning that as “Head Honcho” he made moves that H-D insiders historically shied away from.  He played hardball with dealers, shed crappy brands, cut labor contracts, made major job cuts and closed plants. Some folks were let go just prior to Christmas, but unfazed he continued to trim the fat and raised cash by selling some old investments, like Harley’s semi-secret test track in the Everglades.  He also challenged Harley’s own traditional norms by altering its marketing strategy to attract non-traditional segments, like women and minorities.  He also embarked on an international growth strategy that will eventually bring the all the products, the parts, the lifestyle, and the American V-Twin to enthusiasts worldwide.  The financial numbers speak for themselves.
All this from a guy who came to the Motor Company and did not even ride any kind of motorcycle!  He’s earned a raise.  How hard is it to understand… Harley success = Industry success.
Photo taken by author’s iPhone and post-processed in Snapseed (Nik Software).
All Rights Reserved © Northwest Harley Blog
Share this:Share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Pinterest (Opens in new window)Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)Click to share on Tumblr (Opens in new window)Like this:Like Loading... Read Full Post »


Older Posts »




July 2017


S
M
T
W
T
F
S




« Jun
 
 




 1


2345678


9101112131415


16171819202122


23242526272829


3031
 


Archives Archives

Select Month
 June 2017  (4)
 May 2017  (5)
 April 2017  (6)
 March 2017  (2)
 February 2017  (1)
 January 2017  (1)
 November 2016  (1)
 October 2016  (1)
 September 2016  (2)
 August 2016  (7)
 July 2016  (12)
 September 2015  (1)
 August 2015  (2)
 July 2015  (4)
 June 2015  (5)
 May 2015  (1)
 February 2015  (2)
 January 2015  (1)
 December 2014  (4)
 November 2014  (2)
 October 2014  (4)
 September 2014  (4)
 August 2014  (9)
 July 2014  (14)
 June 2014  (11)
 May 2014  (12)
 April 2014  (2)
 March 2014  (1)
 February 2014  (8)
 January 2014  (7)
 December 2013  (3)
 November 2013  (6)
 October 2013  (5)
 September 2013  (7)
 August 2013  (7)
 July 2013  (9)
 June 2013  (16)
 May 2013  (12)
 April 2013  (5)
 March 2013  (8)
 February 2013  (7)
 January 2013  (6)
 December 2012  (6)
 November 2012  (6)
 October 2012  (10)
 September 2012  (12)
 June 2012  (8)
 May 2012  (9)
 April 2012  (6)
 March 2012  (9)
 February 2012  (3)
 January 2012  (7)
 December 2011  (9)
 November 2011  (3)
 October 2011  (6)
 September 2011  (6)
 August 2011  (5)
 July 2011  (6)
 June 2011  (9)
 May 2011  (13)
 April 2011  (7)
 March 2011  (12)
 February 2011  (16)
 January 2011  (5)
 December 2010  (12)
 November 2010  (4)
 October 2010  (12)
 September 2010  (15)
 August 2010  (14)
 July 2010  (21)
 June 2010  (17)
 May 2010  (10)
 April 2010  (20)
 March 2010  (17)
 February 2010  (21)
 January 2010  (11)
 December 2009  (17)
 November 2009  (14)
 October 2009  (7)
 September 2009  (26)
 August 2009  (25)
 July 2009  (24)
 June 2009  (26)
 May 2009  (19)
 April 2009  (19)
 March 2009  (24)
 February 2009  (18)
 January 2009  (26)
 December 2008  (25)
 November 2008  (21)
 October 2008  (43)
 September 2008  (35)
 August 2008  (28)
 July 2008  (18)
 June 2008  (13)
 May 2008  (17)
 April 2008  (14)
 March 2008  (6)
 February 2008  (6)
 January 2008  (12)
 December 2007  (5)
 November 2007  (8)
 October 2007  (17)
 September 2007  (3)
 August 2007  (12)
 July 2007  (10)

Top Posts 

						Outlaw Motorcycle Gangs Flying Colors in Oregon					



						Lewis And Clark Touring Rally - 2017					



						Harley Crotch Rocket - XR1200					



						UPDATED: April 24, 2017 -- Added a tab "Engine His…					



						The Pendleton Bike Week - Success And Tragedy					

HOG Photos


 

			More Photos		


1%
105th
105th Anniversary
110th Anniversary
2009
2010
ABATE
Accidents
Ads
Advertising
Age
Baker City
BMW
Brand
Buell
CEO
Earnings
Economy
Event
Events
FX
H-D
HAMC
Harley
Harley-Davidson
HD
Hells Angels
Hells Canyon Motorcycle Rally
HOG
Honda
Idaho
Indian
Keith E. Wandell
Keith Wandell
Las Vegas
Laughlin
Laughlin River Run
Legal
Legislation
Leo
Mark-Hans Richer
marketing
Milwaukee
Motorcycle
motorcycles
Music
Nevada
NHTSA
NV
ODOT
OMG
OR
Oregon
OSP
Portland
President
Project RUSHMORE
Rally
Recall
Reno
Ride Home
Road Glide
Road Trip
Safety
Sales
SD
SOA
Sons of Anarchy
South Dakota
Street Vibrations
Sturgis
Travel
Vets
WA
YamahaNWHog Comments 
Gary on Dancing With The Heat Dra…Héctor Hugo Ojeda Oy… on Las Vegas 40th Anniversar…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson (HOG… on Harley-Davidson — Did Yo…Harley-Davidson… on CEO’s That Made Har…CEO’s That Mad… on Woody Farewell For Harley-Davi…CEO’s That Mad… on Go Italian 
Blog Stats 
1,953,298 hits

105th Anniversary

It’s Time Ride


110th Anniversary

The Rumble Heard 'Round The World


Builders

Big Dog Cycles
C-51 Customs
Choppahead Custom Cycles
Choppers Inc.
Cro Customs
Cyril Huze Customs
Exile Cycles
Guilty Customs
Harley Restoration
Hippy Killer Garage
HOG Killers
Kendall Johnson Customs
Kickass Choppers
Klock Werks Cycles
OCC
Paul Yaffe Cycles
Phil’s Chopper Shack
Power Plant Choppers
Salinas Boys Choppers
Shinya Kimura
Sucker Punch Sallys
Vintage Twin
Walt Siegl Customs
West Coast Choppers
Wild West Customs


Clothing

415 Clothing
Black Kat Kustoms
Glory
GuyQGoods
Jamin Leather
Langlitz Leathers
Lollipop Lingerie
Lucky 13


Clubs

Desert Riders MC
Iron Pigs
Oregon Scooters
Oregon Vintage Motorcyclists
Rose City Motorcycle Club
Sunset HOG Chapter


Events

Arizona Bike Week
Laughlin River Run
Rolling Thunder Rally
Street Vibrations
Sturgis Rally


Female Riders

I Ride My Own
The Moto Lady


Forums

Harley-Davidson
HD Forum
J&P Cycle
Motorcycle
Motorcycle USA
V-Twin
Victory
Yamaha


Hot Links

Hot Pics


Latest News

Clutch and Chrome
Cycle Source Magazine
DicE Magazine
Gangsters Out
HOG Radio
IronWorks Magazine
Motorcycle Books
OSP News Releases
Police Accident Flash Alert
Police Misconduct
Thunder Press


Organizations

A.B.A.T.E
Abu Dhabi H.O.G.
American Motorcyclist Assn.
BikePAC of Oregon
Bikers For Christ
DOJ
H.O.G
Honor and Remember
Iron Butt Association
Ride To Work
Road Glide Org


Other Harley Blogs

Arizona Harley Dude
Big Money Blog
Cyril Huze Blog
Dave Dragon Blog
Gary S France
Harley Forums
Henshaw Hog Blog
Iowa Harley Girl
IronWorks
LimpNickie
Maniac Muddy Tires Blog
Motorcycle Philosophy Blog
Ms M’s
Road Captain USA
Road King UK
Road-Quest
Swags Rant
Travelin'gringo
Upright Motorcycle Brigade
V-Twin Motorcycle Blog
Women Motorcyclist
WWGinger Blog


Products

Biker at Home
Clutch & Chrome
Custom Chrome
Ducati
Gremlin Bells
H-D Challenger Coins
Harley-Davidson
Honda Motorcycles
JP Cycles
K & G Motorcycle Parts
Kawasaki
Kuryakyn
Leather Up
Maniac Muddy Tires Blog
Motorcycle Calendars
Motorcycle Fairing
OilBud™
Paradise Harley-Davidson
Performance Machine
Refueled Magazine
Renegade Wheels
Slick Customs
Theobald Leather
Triumph
Vance & Hines
Vespa
Victory
Welding Supply
Yamaha


Routes & Maps

Best Biking Roads
ByWays
Greatest Road
Harley Route Planner
Idaho Byways
My Scenic Drives
Oregon Byways
Oregon Weather
Road-Quest
Roads Northwest
Sunday Morning Rides
Travel Oregon
Trip Check


Safety

Motorcyle Safety Foundation


Saloon's

Broken Spoke
Wankers Corner


Transportation

KGM Motorcycle Transport


Meta 
Register Log in
Entries RSS
Comments RSS
WordPress.com 


Search for:



Follow me on TwitterMy Tweets





Create a free website or blog at WordPress.com.
WPThemes.



















						Northwest Harley Blog					


Blog at WordPress.com. 





Post to



Cancel







 










 



		Privacy & Cookies: This site uses cookies from WordPress.com and selected partners. To find out more, as well as how to remove or block these, see here: Our Cookie Policy













 
 
%d bloggers like this:






































































































































Marketing mix of Harley Davidson     Skip to content Skip to primary sidebar Skip to footerMain navigationMarketing91Header Right  Home » Marketing mix articles » Marketing mix of Harley DavidsonMarketing mix of Harley DavidsonBy Hitesh Bhasin December 4, 2016The legacy of Harley Davidson began in the year 1903, in Milwaukee, Wisconsin, U.S.A when two young and exuberant minds of two friends William S. Harley and Arthur Davidson, started working on a project which was to overcome a hurdle of climbing hills on a cycle, in the nearby up hills. They planned to equip their cycle with a motorized engine to solve this situation and utilized a garage space in the house of Mr. Davidson, where the very first engine with a capacity of 116 cc was developed and fit into a cycle.    What started as a mere experiment went on to become one of the most iconic brands in motorcycle industry, which is sought after by people across age groups and borders alike, and has created a niche for itself, by providing out of the box designs and latest technology, constantly changing with times, and in fact remaining abreast sometimes.Currently, after more than 100 years of its inception, the company is headed by C.E.O Keith E.Wandell, and has operations in almost all major countries across the globe and a strong employee base of more than 6000. This paper is focused on the marketing function of Harley Davidson, and bring forth its marketing-mix and related strategies.PRODUCT IN THE MARKETING MIX OF HARLEY DAVIDSONFrom the very beginning, Harley Davidson has maintained a certain level of WOW factor in providing its bike models in the market and has always aimed at heavily built bikes, which contain a strong engine, which gives both power and the trademark thumping sound, which in a way is also its identity. Another trademark of Harley davidson are its design, which are customized as per the biker and there are so many unique bik designs that even the customer is spoilt for choice. All the designs are dashing and most importantly UNIQUE to Harley Davidson only.   These bikes are considered as “mean machines” that inspire awe and enchant millions with uniquely benchmarked shapes and designing. Harley Davidson is the icon in terms of highway cruising bikes, which allows long stretch drives, inspired from widespread road network of its parent company. Heavy and high displacement engines have been an inseparable part of Harley Davidson association, which have been known to bear any condition and outperform in severity. In all, they offer customers variety of models to choose from, apart from dealing with accessories, and engines, that can be traded cheaply, as the bikes are highly customizable and option windows are open to its customers and prospects.Salient points for product in the marketing mix of Harley Davidson1. Very strong product portfolio 2. Personalization of product really impresses customers 3. High technology product which ignites passion for bikersPRICE IN THE MARKETING MIX OF HARLEY DAVIDSONAs the company deals in mainly heavy built chassis and high displacement engines, it denotes that it aims at a particular level of quality in its products, and at the same time, aims at a particular segment or class of customers. Harley DAvidson has always been a ultra premium priced product for the motorcycle segment and it makes no excuses for the same.However, due to this policy, the company has even experienced certain setbacks and has gone through red periods in its profit curves, which were overcome by means of rightsizing and layoffs. Still, it carries its bandwagon forward with similar strategies in pricing function. The effect is that Harley Davidson probably has the best positionings when it comes to names of premium Motorcycles. And a lot of this premium positioning is contributed because of the price of the motorcycle.Salient points for Price in the marketing mix of Harley Davidson    1. Ultra premium pricing for the motorcycle segment 2. High price has contributed immensely to premium positioning in the minds of the customers.PLACE IN THE MARKETING MIX OF HARLEY DAVIDSONAn ideal place is where the customer is. This is undoubtedly the motto of any successful business strategist and market analyst, and in Harley Davidson, it seems this motto is being widely publicized and followed. Due to massive exposure that it has achieved with promotions and media, and with the passage of time, Harley Davidson has got a fantastic brand equity which has resulted in extensive demands from across the globe.Furthermore, a rise in buying potential has given the power in the hands of the customers and thus it was likely that Harley Davidson decided to expand globally. It has been exporting bikes and spares to most parts of the world since a very long time; however it affects its pricing to a greater extent, due to involvement of tax structure and heavy custom duties, which in turn limits this product to only the ardent fans or the growing markets.Major strategic changes are made in production policies, and two major production units are now announced outside home country, namely in India; for the Asian market, and Brazil; to cover distributions in Latin Americas, which is a major “Placement” advantage for Harley Davidson.1. Selective distribution 2. Showrooms are found in premium locations only.PROMOTIONS IN THE MARKETING MIX OF HARLEY DAVIDSONPromotion function has always been very strategically designed and intricately executed by Harley Davidson, which has maintained its class. Rather than going out and out in terms of promotion, it has carried out its campaigns in a very subtle manner by sensibly lpacing Harley bikes and displaying their muscle and glorifying them in movies and television series.It has promoted rallies, bike ride tours, cross country marathon for Harley Davidson owners and introducing HOG (Harley-Davidson Owner’s Groups) culture, which has enticed new customers, and promoted loyalty among current owners. Apart from these, it has organized sale fares, which promote heavy discounts in times of low sales and constantly has been carrying out lucky draws and coupons for discounts on services, free services and spare parts, making the promotion function innovative, classy and out of the box, with the complete package.Because of the strong product portfolio, Harley Davidson does not believe in generalizing itself and therefore advertises only in the top of the line magazines, hoardings and print media vehicles. The major pull for the product is created through the product and the display of the product. Most importantly, Harley Davidson over the year stands for qualities such as strength, friendship, and enjoying the journey of life. Harley encourages its customers to take to the road, and drive the bike to the fill of their heart. With such brand elements, it is hard not to become a top brand in the market.Related To What You Are ReadingOffensive marketing – Strategy and examplesMarketing Strategy of Harley Davidson – Harley Davidson StrategyMarketing Mix of Ducati – Ducati Marketing MixMarketing mix of Procter & Gamble – P&G Marketing mix Share8 Share2 Tweet +1About Hitesh BhasinI love writing about the latest in marketing and advertising. I am a web designer, Search engine optimizer, E-commerce seller & i want my readers to stay ahead of this hectic marketing world. Speak to me on the Marketing Forum. Or you can get daily site updates via email. Let's stay in touch :)Reader InteractionsComments danielle sayswho is the author of this article and when was it publishedReplyTrackbacks[…] Marketing mix – Click here to read the Marketing mix of Harley Davidson […]ReplyLeave a Reply Cancel replyYour email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *CommentName * Email * Website    Current ye@r *   Leave this field empty Primary SidebarFollow Marketing91 Updates   Get Daily Marketing updates!! First Name Enter your Email Address         Best of Marketing91Start Here – Marketing tutorials30 Marketing Strategy ModelsMarketing Strategy tutorialsSales Management tutorialsBranding tutorialsMarket research tutorialsOnline Marketing tutorialsCustomer Management TutorialsBusiness tutorialsRecent postsHome » Marketing mix articles » Marketing mix of Harley Davidson The Importance of Delegation SWOT Analysis of Ford motor company The Role of Managers in grooming their Employees Differences Between Centralized And Decentralized Organization What is Corporate Advertising? Examples of Corporate Advertising How to plan Employee Rewards to Motivate your Employees? Why customer perception is important? Top 10 largest companies in the world of 2017 Top Engineering companies in the world in 2017 How to make a Job Description? A guide for ManagersYoutube channelFooterRecent ArticlesHome » Marketing mix articles » Marketing mix of Harley Davidson The Importance of Delegation SWOT Analysis of Ford motor company The Role of Managers in grooming their Employees Differences Between Centralized And Decentralized Organization What is Corporate Advertising? Examples of Corporate AdvertisingOther linksContact meArchivesPrivacy PolicyAbout Marketing91Sitemap Marketing mix on Marketing91 - The 4 P's     Skip to content Skip to primary sidebar Skip to footerMain navigationMarketing91Header Right  Marketing mix articlesHome » Marketing mix articlesMarketing Mix Of Maybelline – Maybelline Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 19, 2017Maybelline is associated with FMCG sector and deals in the cosmetics industry. It is of American origins and is a fully-owned subsidiary of its parent company L’Oreal. Maybelline was founded in the year 1915 by its founder Tom Lyle Williams and was acquired by its present owner in the year 1996. Some of its competitors are as follows-Elle 18
Lakme
Revlon
Estee … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Maybelline – Maybelline Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Maaza – Maaza Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 19, 2017Maaza is a fruit drink and is associated with beverage industry. It is of Indian origin and occupies largest market share in the fruit drink market. Maaza is a subsidiary brand of its owner The Coca-Cola Company. It was launched in Indian market in the year 1976 and since then has been introduced in several global markets. Maaza has a refreshing and irresistible taste that has … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Maaza – Maaza Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of M&M’s – M&M’s Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 19, 2017M&M’s is a subsidiary brand of its owner company Mars Incorporated. It is a candy shell made of chocolate as its main ingredient and is associated with the food industry. M&M’s is of American origins and was launched in the year 1941. Its initials are the names of its creators Bruce Murrie and Forest Mars. Brand faces competition from other chocolate makers and some of … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of M&M’s – M&M’s Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lipton – Lipton Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 17, 2017Lipton is associated with beverage industry as it deals with marketing of tea. The company was founded in the year 1890 by its founder Thomas Lipton. Currently, it is jointly owned and marketed by its parent companies PepsiCo and Unilever with 50-50 ownership.  Lipton has been projected as a healthy and refreshing drink and some of its competitors are as follows-Society … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lipton – Lipton Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Linkedin – Linkedin Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 17, 2017LinkedIn is a social networking site associated with internet industry. It is an employment oriented platform that is used mainly by professionals. LinkedIn was founded in the year 2002 and launched for usage in the year 2003, May, by its co-founders Eric ly, Jean-Luc Vaillant, Konstantin Guericke, Allen Blue and Reid Hoffman. It is a subsidiary of its owner company Microsoft … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Linkedin – Linkedin Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lifebuoy – Lifebuoy Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 17, 2017Lifebuoy is associated with FMCG sector and is a personal care brand. It is marketed and manufactured by its parent company Unilever. Lifebuoy was introduced in the consumer market in the year 1895 by its founder Lever brothers. Some of its competitors are as follows-Savlon
DettolProduct in the Marketing Mix Of Lifebuoy :
Lifebuoy is the leading brand of soap … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lifebuoy – Lifebuoy Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lux – Lux Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 17, 2017Lux is associated with FMCG industry and deals in the personal healthcare segment. It is a subsidiary brand of its parent company Unilever and was founded in the year 1899 by Lever Brothers. In the year 1900, its brand name was changed to Lux from Sunlight Flakes and it was launched in the consumer market of United States in the year 1925 and the United Kingdom in the year … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lux – Lux Marketing MixMarketing Mix of Barista – Barista Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 15, 2017Barista Lavazza is a chain of Espresso Coffee bars hailing from India. The chain was first established in February 2000 and later acquired by Lavazza in 2007. Thereafter, it was re-christened Barista Lavazza. The Barista Lavazza espresso coffee bar chain is headquartered in New Delhi, India.  The company founded by Pratha Duttagupta is also operational in South Asia and the … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix of Barista – Barista Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Carlsberg – Carlsberg Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 15, 2017Carlsberg is a public limited company that is associated with beverage industry. It was founded by J. C. Jacobsen of Danish origin in the year 1847 and its first headquarters was based in Copenhagen in Denmark. The flagship brand of this renowned company is Carlsberg Beer and it also brews Baltika, Somersby Cider, Tuborg and few local beers. In the year 2001, the company was … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Carlsberg – Carlsberg Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lenskart.Com – Lenskart.Com Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 14, 2017Lenskart.com is a private company of Indian origin. It was founded in the year 2010 by its co-founders Sumeet Kapahi, Amit Chaudhary and Peyush Bansal. It is associated with e-commerce and accessories industry and deals in supplying eyewear. In March 2016 it was reported by NDTV that two lakh visitor’s visit Lenskart.com every day and it ships nearly 800-900 glasses on a daily … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lenskart.Com – Lenskart.Com Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lakme – Lakme Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 12, 2017Lakme is associated with FMCG industry and deals in personal care products. It is a cosmetic brand of Indian origin founded in the year 1952 by its founder J.R. D. Tata. Lakme was a subsidiary of its parent company Tomco but in the year 1996 its ownership changed hands and currently it is owned by Hindustan Unilever. Lakme occupies the first position as leading brand for … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lakme – Lakme Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lacoste – Lacoste Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 12, 2017LaCoste is associated with Lifestyle and Retail industry and deals in accessories and apparels. It is of French origin and was founded in the year 1933 by its famous co-founders Andre Gillier and Rene Lacoste. The brand is easily recognisable through its logo of the green crocodile as Rene Lacoste was popularly hailed by his fans as the Crocodile. In the year 2012, the brand … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lacoste – Lacoste Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of LIC India – LIC India Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 9, 2017LIC India is associated with insurance and finance industry. It is owned by Government of India and is of Indian origin. LIC India was founded in the year 1956 by merging nearly two hundred and forty-five provident societies and insurance companies prevalent at that time. It has become largest Indian insurance company with rupees 1,560,482 crore asset value.  Some of its … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of LIC India – LIC India Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Lexus – Lexus Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 9, 2017Lexus is a subsidiary division of its parent company Toyota. It is associated with automotive industry and deals in manufacturing and marketing of premium vehicles.  Lexus marquee is of Japanese origin and was founded in the year 1989 by its founder Eiji Toyoda.
In terms of market value, it has been positioned as one of the ten largest global brands of Japanese origin. Lexus … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Lexus – Lexus Marketing MixMarketing Mix Of Kohinoor Condoms – Kohinoor Condoms Marketing MixBy Hitesh Bhasin January 7, 2017Kohinoor Condoms is an established brand of Indian origin associated with FMCG industry. It is a personal care product for males and is used as a contraceptive brand. A company has targeted urban people who are above 18 years as its potential customers. Education has helped people in understanding the advantages of condom usage and this has helped the brand in creating a good … [Read more...] about Marketing Mix Of Kohinoor Condoms – Kohinoor Condoms Marketing MixPage 1Page 2Page 3…Page 42Next Page »Primary SidebarFollow Marketing91 Updates   Get Daily Marketing updates!! First Name Enter your Email Address         Best of Marketing91Start Here – Marketing tutorials30 Marketing Strategy ModelsMarketing Strategy tutorialsSales Management tutorialsBranding tutorialsMarket research tutorialsOnline Marketing tutorialsCustomer Management TutorialsBusiness tutorialsRecent postsHome » Marketing mix articles The Importance of Delegation SWOT Analysis of Ford motor company The Role of Managers in grooming their Employees Differences Between Centralized And Decentralized Organization What is Corporate Advertising? Examples of Corporate Advertising How to plan Employee Rewards to Motivate your Employees? Why customer perception is important? Top 10 largest companies in the world of 2017 Top Engineering companies in the world in 2017 How to make a Job Description? A guide for ManagersYoutube channelFooterRecent ArticlesHome » Marketing mix articles The Importance of Delegation SWOT Analysis of Ford motor company The Role of Managers in grooming their Employees Differences Between Centralized And Decentralized Organization What is Corporate Advertising? Examples of Corporate AdvertisingOther linksContact meArchivesPrivacy PolicyAbout Marketing91Sitemap 






















































HARLEY-DAVIDSON NAMES KEITH E. WANDELL PRESIDENT AND CEO | Hot Bike















Skip to main content





 








 




Subscribe
 





 









SUBSCRIBE


 



 











Bikes 

HARLEY-DAVIDSON NAMES KEITH E. WANDELL PRESIDENT AND CEO

New CEO



By
ernie lopez
 posted Apr 8th, 2009 at 1:41pm 









 




 Comments 









HARLEY-DAVIDSON NAMES KEITH E. WANDELL PRESIDENT AND CEO
COMPANY UNVEILS BROADER ORGANIZATIONAL LEADERSHIP CHANGES
Matthew S. Levatich Named Harley-Davidson Motor Company President and CEO
James A. McCaslin to Become Executive Vice President for Corporate Product Planning
Enrico D'Onofrio to Assume Senior Post at MV Agusta
MILWAUKEE, April 6, 2009 - Harley-Davidson Inc. (NYSE:HOG) has named Keith E. Wandell President and Chief Executive Officer, succeeding James L. Ziemer, who is retiring. Wandell, 59, currently serves as President and Chief Operating Officer of Milwaukee-based Johnson Controls, Inc. (NYSE:JCI), a $38 billion global company. Wandell, a 21-year Johnson Controls veteran, starts his new duties at Harley-Davidson May 1.
"Keith Wandell is a seasoned global business leader who brings tremendous energy, passion, and organizational and talent development capability to his job as Harley-Davidson's new chief executive," said Harley-Davidson, Inc. Board Member Barry K. Allen, who serves as the Board's Presiding Director. "His vision and values make him a great fit, and he is absolutely the right person to now lead Harley-Davidson on its exciting journey."
Regarding his appointment, Wandell commented: "Harley-Davidson has a remarkable record of success and limitless possibilities. I am honored and thrilled to join the Harley-Davidson family and to have this opportunity to help it fulfill dreams, create innovative market-leading products, and expand its opportunities worldwide."
The Company also announced the following organizational leadership changes which, according to Allen, will also serve as a catalyst to drive Harley-Davidson's strategies for growth, operational excellence and leadership development going forward:
Matthew S. Levatich becomes President and Chief Operating Officer of Harley-Davidson Motor Company. Levatich, 44, is currently President and Managing Director of MV Agusta, the Italian motorcycle maker that Harley-Davidson, Inc. acquired last August. While at MV, Levatich spearheaded the restarting of MV's operations. In his 15 years at Harley-Davidson, Levatich has held positions of increasing responsibility in the U.S. and Europe, including Vice President and General Manager of the Company's Parts and Accessories business, and Vice President of Materials Management.
James A. McCaslin moves to Executive Vice President for Corporate Product Planning, reporting to the CEO. In this newly created position, McCaslin has broad oversight of motorcycle product planning and development processes across Harley-Davidson, Inc. McCaslin, 60, has served as President of the Motor Company for the past eight years.
Enrico D'Onofrio, 51, assumes the post of Managing Director, MV Agusta. D'Onofrio joined MV Agusta as Corporate General Director earlier in 2009, overseeing all administrative functions including finance and human resources. Previously he held senior management positions at motorcycle maker Ducati, including CFO, and at Proctor & Gamble in Europe.
All three appointments are also effective May 1.
"The appointment of Matt Levatich to the senior leadership position at Harley-Davidson Motor Company recognizes his demonstrated abilities at relationship management and as a strategic thinker and problem solver on the operations side of the business. He will be a strong leader in his expanded role," said Allen. "Matt's predecessor, Jim McCaslin, has done an outstanding job of leading the Motor Company's operations. His unique talents, passion for products and operational excellence, and market knowledge will now be a great asset to drive the organization forward in the critical area of product planning and development. And we also look forward to growth for MV Agusta, under Enrico's leadership."
"Harley-Davidson has a uniquely powerful brand, strong market leadership, and a richness of talented leaders and employees who know this business intimately. Keith's arrival and these other leadership changes make a powerful combination that will advance the great work going on all across the organization to attract new riders, grow our core rider base and expand internationally," Allen said.
"On behalf of the entire Board of Directors, I also want to thank Jim Ziemer for his 40 years of service to Harley-Davidson and wish him well on his upcoming retirement. All of us who have worked with Jim throughout the years have benefited from his leadership, his selfless commitment to the Company, and his contributions to making the brand one of the most admired and successful brands in the world," said Allen.
 






      Tags:
    


custom bikes 

editorial 

harley davidson 

Hot Bike - Custom V-Twin Motorcycles 






 



View the discussion thread. 



 







 















2017 V-Twin Gear & Accessories Guide





Featured Customs

 

Latest

 

Video

 

 
 

















































	
		
		
		Form  4          DANA INC                  For: Jun 02  Filed by: WANDELL KEITH E
	
	









		Research: Stocks: News Story
	












Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 












			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >


				
					
					
						News & Events
					
				
				 >
			












Stock Details

Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Stock Research Overview
Stock Screeners
Markets & Sectors
Fidelity Learning Center 




















Print Format


Change Text Size:


Default text sizeA


Larger text sizeA


Largest text sizeA









Form  4          DANA INC                  For: Jun 02  Filed by: WANDELL KEITH E
BY 10K Wizard— 3:28 PM ET 06/06/2017


http://archive.fast-edgar.com/20170606/AVK2JQ2COC22NZZ2222L2ZZZBPC8M2M24292

Filed on: June 6, 2017





More DAN News



BRIEF-Dana Inc breaks ground on new manufacturing, assembly facility in Chongqing

						Reuters -
						




10:10 AM ET 06/06/2017


					



Dana Begins Construction of Facility in Chongqing, China, to Produce Advanced Driveline Products

						PR Newswire -
						




10:03 AM ET 06/06/2017


					



Dana Honored by Ford Motor Company at 19th Annual Ford World Excellence Awards

						PR Newswire -
						




2:13 PM ET 05/22/2017


					













 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 
















































	
		
		
		Stock Market Research: Top Stocks, Quotes & News - Fidelity Investments
	
	





















Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 












			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >













Stock Details


Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.






Stock Research & Ideas



You are here: Stock Research Center


		
		
		
		My Research 

Screen & Filter

Stock Screeners
Preset Expert Strategies

News & Insights

Events Calendar
Upgrades / Downgrades

Explore Firm Research

Research Firms
Research Firm Scorecards
Reports Search





RELATED RESOURCES

Fidelity Learning Center 
U.S. Markets
Global Markets
Sectors & Industries
















Stock Research Center

 Not a Fidelity Customer?
    No problem! Try our research for FREE without opening an account.




 














Trending Stocks



Market Movers
Top Rated by Sector
Orders by Fidelity Customers






Filters:


Refresh
Equity Summary Score


Provided by Starmine












Investing Insights



Technical Events
PROVIDED BY Recognia AS OF 07/21/2017
Methodology
RECOGNIA METHODOLOGY
Bullish and Bearish Events of the Day provide long/short trading ideas by identifying U.S. stocks that have recently formed a bullish or bearish classic chart pattern. Patterns must have taken at least 35 days to form, which draws out the more significant patterns for intermediate or long-term trend direction. The list is then filtered to include stocks with a minimum $3.00 for bullish and $5.00 for bearish close price; and, a minimum 50,000 trading volume. Most recent patterns are listed first. Patterns on the same date are sorted using Recognia's proprietary quantitative algorithm to draw strong companies to the top, and if further sorting is required (for stocks with the same quantitative analysis result) it is done by trading volume to draw highest volume stocks to the top.





SBGI
Log in for Events


HOLX


CATY


GMED


AEHR








PBF
Log in for Events


RYI


TIER


ETM


SONS




Find out how to use fundamental analysis and technical analysis when evaluating stocks, with the help of the Fidelity Learning Center.






My Research – 
Organize and track your favorite securities.


				
				
				
				Get started 





Today's Events
AS OF 1:56 PM ET 07/21/2017







Earnings (39)
Dividends (5)
Splits (11)


Upgrades (95)
Downgrades (116)
Economic (0)










Upcoming Webinar Events
Visit the Learning Center Events page for a full list of upcoming webinars.
	














The Equity Summary Score is provided for informational purposes only, does not constitute advice or guidance, and is not an endorsement or recommendation for any particular security or trading strategy. The Equity Summary Score is provided by Thomson Reuters StarMine, an independent company not affiliated with Fidelity Investments.*GICS® (Global Industry Classification Standards) is an industry classification system developed by Standard & Poor's in collaboration with Morgan Stanley Capital International (MSCI). S&P uses GICS to determine the market segment to which a company is assigned.News, commentary (including "Related Symbols") and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.Stock markets, especially foreign markets, are volatile and can decline significantly in response to adverse issuer, political, regulatory, market, or economic developments. Sector funds can be more volatile because of their narrow concentration in a specific industry.System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.The Fidelity Screeners are research tools provided to help self-directed investors evaluate securities. The criteria and inputs entered are at the sole discretion of the user, and all screens or strategies with preselected criteria are solely for the convenience of the user. Information supplied or obtained from the Screeners is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell securities, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy or approach to screening or evaluating stocks, preferred securities, exchange traded products or closed end funds. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use. Determine which securities are right for you based on your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors and re-evaluate them on a periodic basis.














 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 





















































	
		
		
		DAN Stock News - Fidelity
	
	




















Skip to Main Content.
Site navigation
Fidelity.com Home


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 


Search Fidelity.com




 

 



Accounts & Trade



PortfolioLog In Required


Account PositionsLog In Required


TradeLog In Required


Active Trader ProLog In Required


TransferLog In Required


Cash ManagementLog In Required


BillPayLog In Required


Full ViewLog In Required


ProfileLog In Required


Account FeaturesLog In Required


StatementsLog In Required

Tax Information

Retirement DistributionsLog In Required



OFFER See our featured trading offer. Learn more.



Planning & Advice


What We Offer
Financial Basics
Building Savings
Managing & Growing Wealth
Retirement
Life Events



News & Research


News
Watch ListLog In Required
Quotes
AlertsLog In Required
Mutual Funds
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Markets & Sectors
IPOs
Annuities
Learning Center
Notebook
Notebook



Investment Products


Mutual Funds
Retirement & IRAs
Trading
Stocks
Fixed Income, Bonds & CDs
ETFs
Options
Sector Investing
Cash Management & Credit Cards
Managed Accounts
Fidelity Go
529 College Savings
Annuities
Life Insurance & Long Term Care



Why Fidelity


The Fidelity Advantage
Planning & Advice
Trading
Straightforward Pricing
Insights & Tools
Security & Protection


 


Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log In

Customer Service
Open An Account
Refer A Friend
Log Out
 













			Content and data provided by various third parties and Fidelity − Terms of Use




Research >
Stocks >












Stock Details

Enter Company or Symbol. Press down arrow for suggestions, or Escape to return to entry field.







View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Adv Chart & Technical..
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings



View this information for the company or symbol

Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart
News
Analyst Reports



Find Symbol. Opens in new window.







Snapshot
Detailed Quote
Advanced Chart & Technical Analysis 
News & Events
Compare
Analyst Opinions
Research Reports
Key Statistics
Earnings
Dividends
Ownership & Insiders
Financial Statements
SEC Filings





RELATED RESOURCES

Stock Research Overview
Stock Screeners
Markets & Sectors
Fidelity Learning Center 

















Print
|
Help/Glossary




Help/Glossary








News & Events:DAN

DANA INCORPORATED

23.35 -0.33 (-1.39 %)as of 1:43:38pm ET 07/21/2017



			
				Quotes delayed at least 15 min.
				
				
					
					
					
					
					Log in for real time quote.





Add to Watch List
Set Alert
Hypothetical Trade
Option Chain


Price History 

Download to CSV file
Download to Excel file


















Log in for more news

Expand all| Collapse all



















                                                    Dana Incorporated to Announce Second-Quarter 2017 Results, Host Conference Call and Webcast on July 31
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    8:17 AM ET 07/11/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, July 11, 2017  Dana Incorporated (DAN) will release its 2017 second-quarter financial results on Monday, July 31, 2017. 5 p.m. on July 31 by dialing 1-855-859-2056 or 1-404-537-3406 and entering conference I.D. 51037995.

















                                                    Dana Earns Quality Award from PACCAR
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    9:39 AM ET 06/21/2017
                                                


Dana's manufacturing facilities in Lima, Ohio; Sterling, Illinois; Danville, Kentucky; Wellingborough, U.K.; and Sorocaba, Brazil, were honored for their commitment to excellent quality and warranty performance in providing PACCAR with products that achieved 10 PPM or better level of quality. "Throughout the world, our trucks have earned a reputation for unsurpassed quality.

















                                                    Dana to Supply Driveshaft Assemblies, Motion Systems for New York Wheel
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    9:39 AM ET 06/19/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, June 19, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Dana Incorporated (DAN) today announced that it is providing driveshaft assemblies and gearboxes for the New York Wheel  which will be the world's tallest observation wheel. The New York Wheel features 36 pods that will each hold 40 people, taking visitors on a leisurely ride with a view of the Statue of Liberty and Manhattan skyline.

















                                                    Breakfast Technical Briefing on Auto Parts Stocks -- BorgWarner, Dana, Delphi Automotive, and Tenneco
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    6:10 AM ET 06/19/2017
                                                


NEW YORK, June 19, 2017 DailystockTracker.com is currently reviewing BorgWarner Inc. (BWA), Dana Inc. (DAN), Delphi Automotive PLC (DLPH), and Tenneco Inc. (TEN). According to a report on First Research, economic expansion in emerging markets worldwide is expected to drive healthy growth in the Auto Parts Manufacturing sector over the next several years, which should bolster demand for auto parts. http://dailystocktrac...

















                                                    Dana Incorporated Achieves Innovation Milestone of 10,000 Patents
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    9:17 AM ET 06/14/2017
                                                


"Dana consistently maintains a sharp focus on innovation, and the drive to advance technology is a cornerstone of our culture," said George Constand, Dana's chief technical officer. Brian Cheadle, a member of the design team that created the patented heat exchanger, believes that achieving this milestone is a source of pride for Dana's engineering and technical professionals.

















                                                    BRIEF-Dana Inc breaks ground on new manufacturing, assembly facility in Chongqing
                                                


                                                    Reuters – 
                                                    10:10 AM ET 06/06/2017
                                                


Dana Inc (DAN): * Broke ground on a new 7,500 square-meter manufacturing, assembly facility in Chongqing that will produce driveline products for Chinese market. * Is investing about $23 million on new operation, which will employ approximately 130 associates when full production is reached in 2020 Source text for Eikon: Further company coverage:

















                                                    Dana Begins Construction of Facility in Chongqing, China, to Produce Advanced Driveline Products
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    10:03 AM ET 06/06/2017
                                                


CHONGQING, China, June 6, 2017 Dana Incorporated (DAN) today broke ground on a new 7,500 square-meter manufacturing and assembly facility in Chongqing, China, that will produce advanced driveline products for the Chinese market. ® SmartConnect disconnecting all-wheel-drive systems.

















                                                    Dana Honored by Ford Motor Company at 19th Annual Ford World Excellence Awards
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    2:13 PM ET 05/22/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, May 22, 2017  Dana Incorporated (DAN) has been honored by Ford Motor Company as a top-performing supplier, receiving a Ford World Excellence Award. The announcement was made during the 19th annual Ford World Excellence Awards ceremony, held last week at the Henry Ford Museum in Dearborn, Michigan.

















                                                    BRIEF-DANA TO EXPAND MANUFACTURING CAPABILITIES INTO WESTERN CHINA
                                                


                                                    Reuters – 
                                                    11:36 AM ET 05/18/2017
                                                


Dana Inc (DAN): * DANA TO EXPAND MANUFACTURING CAPABILITIES INTO WESTERN CHINA. * Dana Inc (DAN) - THAT COMPANY WILL BUILD A NEW 7,500 SQUARE-METER MANUFACTURING FACILITY IN CHONGQING, CHINA. * DANA - TO INVEST ABOUT $13 MILLION TO BUILD NEW OPERATION, WHICH WILL EMPLOY ABOUT 130 ASSOCIATES WHEN FULL PRODUCTION IS REACHED IN 2020 Source text for Eikon: Further company coverage:

















                                                    Dana to Expand Manufacturing Capabilities into Western China
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    11:21 AM ET 05/18/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, May 18, 2017  In support of new business growth, Dana Incorporated (DAN) today announced that the company will build a new 7,500 square-meter manufacturing facility in Chongqing, China. ® SmartConnect disconnecting all-wheel-drive technology as part of a global program for a major automaker.

















                                                    Dana Named Innovation Supplier of the Year by FCA
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    1:58 PM ET 05/15/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, May 15, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- Dana Incorporated (DAN) has been honored by FCA US LLC as the "2017 Innovation Supplier of the Year" for North America. Specifically, Dana was acknowledged for developing a technologically advanced heat exchanger for the induction-air system on FCA's 2018 Dodge Challenger SRT Demon.

















                                                    Technical Reports on Auto Parts Equities -- BorgWarner, American Axle & Manufacturing, Dana, and Tenneco
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    6:40 AM ET 05/08/2017
                                                


NEW YORK, May 8, 2017 Stock-Callers.com is currently monitoring these four Auto Parts companies: BorgWarner Inc. (BWA), American Axle & Manufacturing Holdings Inc. (AXL), Dana Inc. (DAN), and Tenneco Inc. (TEN). Demand for auto parts is driven by new car sales, which are strongly affected by interest rates and the replacement market. http://stock-callers.com/registration. BorgWarner.

















                                                    BRIEF-Dana Inc Q1 adjusted earnings per share $0.63
                                                


                                                    Reuters – 
                                                    7:09 AM ET 05/02/2017
                                                


Dana Inc (DAN). * Dana incorporated (DAN) announces first-quarter 2017 financial results; affirms full-year guidance. * Q1 adjusted earnings per share $0.63. * Q1 earnings per share $0.51. * Q1 sales $1.7 billion versus i/b/e/s view $1.55 billion.

















                                                    Dana Incorporated Announces First-Quarter 2017 Financial Results; Affirms Full-Year Guidance
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    6:59 AM ET 05/02/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, May 2, 2017 Highlights  . First-Quarter Financial Results  Sales for the first quarter of 2017 totaled $1.70 billion, compared with $1.45 billion in the same period of 2016, representing a 17 percent increase. Net income attributable to Dana for the first quarter was $75 million, compared with $45 million in the same period last year.

















                                                    Dana to Pay Dividend on Common Stock
                                                


                                                    PR Newswire – 
                                                    4:30 PM ET 04/27/2017
                                                


MAUMEE, Ohio, April 27, 2017 Dana Incorporated (DAN) announced today that its board of directors has declared a dividend on its common stock.  . $0.06 per share, payable June 2, 2017, to holders of Dana common stock as of May 12. About Dana Incorporated Dana is a world leader in highly engineered solutions for improving the efficiency, performance, and sustainability of powered vehicles and machinery.












Page: 


Page 1





Today's and Upcoming Events




Jul
31


DAN to announce Q2 earnings Before Market (Confirmed)








Jul
31


DAN Earnings Conference Call at 9:00 AM
        Listen









Past Events (last 90 days)




May
10


DAN ex-Dividend for $0.06 on 5/10/2017


Announce Date: 4/27/2017
Record Date: 5/12/2017
Pay Date: 6/2/2017








Data provided by Wall Street Horizon, Inc. © 2017

Technical Events

Classic Patterns (past 90 days)
PROVIDED BY RECOGNIA, INC.

Log in for trading events

View All Technical Analysis in Advanced Chart 



Technical Analysis
PROVIDED BY TRADING CENTRAL

Log in for trading events












As with all your investments through Fidelity, you must make your own determination whether an investment is appropriate for you.  Fidelity is not recommending or endorsing this security by making it available to customers.  You should conduct research and perform a thorough investigation as to the characteristics of any securities you intend to purchase.  Before investing, you should read the prospectus, offering circular, indenture, or similar document carefully for a full description of the product, including its features and risks, to determine whether it is an appropriate investment for your investment objectives, risk tolerance, financial situation and other individual factors, and be sure to re-evaluate those factors on a periodic basis.Performance data shown represents past performance, which is no guarantee of future results. Current performance may be higher or lower than the performance data quoted.  Yield and return will vary, therefore, you may have a gain or loss when you sell your shares.Stock markets are volatile and can decline significantly in response to adverse issuer, political, regulatory, market, or economic developments.  Growth stocks can be more volatile than other types of stocks.  Value stocks can continue to be undervalued by the market for long periods of time.  Foreign securities are subject to interest-rate, currency-exchange-rate, economic, and political risks, all of which are magnified in emerging markets.  Illiquidity is an inherent risk associated with investing in real estate and REITs.  There is no guarantee the issuer of a REIT will maintain the secondary market for its shares and redemptions may be at a price which is more or less than the original price paid.  Closed-end funds can trade at a discount to their NAV.  Shareholders of Master Limited Partnerships may be treated as partners for tax purposes.  Partnerships issue a Schedule K-1 (Form 1065) rather than a Form 1099 form for tax purposes. It lists the partner's share of income, deductions, credits, etc.  Speak with your tax advisor to determine how this may affect you.  A royalty trust is a type of corporation, mostly in the United States or Canada, usually involved in oil and gas production or mining.  Royalty trusts may have special tax treatment, so you should consult a tax advisor on the potential tax consequences of investing in them.News, commentary and events are from third-party sources unaffiliated with Fidelity. Fidelity does not endorse or adopt their content.  Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from their use.Any data, charts and other information provided on this page are intended for research purposes to help self-directed investors evaluate many types of securities including, but not limited to common stocks, American Depository Receipts, Master Limited Partnerships, real estate investment trusts. traditional preferred stock, trust preferred securities, third-party trust certificates, convertible securities, mandatory convertible securities and other exchange-traded equity and/or debt securities.  Criteria and inputs entered, including the choice to make security comparisons, are at the sole discretion of the user and are solely for the convenience of the user.  Analyst opinions, ratings and reports are provided by third-parties unaffiliated with Fidelity.  All information supplied or obtained from this page is for informational purposes only and should not be considered investment advice or guidance, an offer of or a solicitation of an offer to buy or sell a security, or a recommendation or endorsement by Fidelity of any security or investment strategy.  Fidelity does not endorse or adopt any particular investment strategy, any analyst opinion/rating/report or any approach to evaluating individual securities. Fidelity makes no guarantees that information supplied is accurate, complete, or timely, and does not provide any warranties regarding results obtained from its use.462499.6.0








 Copyright
1998–2017 FMR LLC. 
All rights reserved. 

Terms of Use|
Privacy|
Security|
Site Map 








































See the Latest Features





PersonalizedGet relevant information about your holdings right when you need it.See Your Performance Click the portfolio icon to get information about stocks you own without leaving the research page.Faster Access to Positions A shortcut to view the full list of positions in your portfolio? Yes, please! Use the ticker search box.Add Your Own Notes Use Notebook to save your investment ideas in one convenient, private, and secure place.





Convenient For YouResearch that's clear, accessible, and all in one place makes for a better experience.One-Stop Shop See everything you need to make investment decisions right in the dashboard.Access Anywhere No matter where you are, use the Stock Research experience across multiple devices.New Ideas, On the Ready Find new ideas using quick links to the Stock Screener.





New Ways to ResearchDiscover new tools to add or diversify your existing research strategy.StockTwits Read live tweets from the financial and investing community about the stock you're interested in.Fundamental Analysis Save time on research by getting an overall assessment of a company's valuation, quality, growth stability, and financial health.Recognia Technical Analysis Perfect for the technical trader—this indicator captures a stock's technical events and converts them into short, medium, and long-term sentiment.Top Competitors See how a stock measures up by instantly comparing it to the industry average and its top four competitors.Social Sentiment Get a sense of people's overall feelings towards a company in social media with this summary tool.Earnings Data Monitor earnings expectations over the past three quarters and model a stock's price based on its P/E.









#395 Keith E Wandell - Forbes.com


















Home
Business
Tech
Markets
Entrepreneurs
Leadership
Personal Finance
ForbesLife
Lists
Opinions
Video
Blogs
E-mail Newsletters
Portfolio Tracker
Special Reports
Commerce
Energy
Health Care
Logistics
Manufacturing
Media
Services
Technology
Wall Street
Washington
CIO Network
Enterprise Tech
Infoimaging
Internet Infrastructure
Internet
Personal Tech
Sciences
Security
Wireless
Bonds
Commodities
Currencies
Economy
Emerging Markets
Equities
Options
Finance
Human Resources
Law & Taxation
Sales & Marketing
Management
Technology
Careers
Compensation
Corporate Citizenship
Corporate Governance
Managing
Innovation
CEO Network
Reference
ETFs
Guru Insights
Investing Ideas
Investor Education
Mutual Funds
Philanthropy
Retirement & College
Taxes & Estates
Collecting
Health
Real Estate
Sports
Style
Travel
Vehicles
Wine & Food
100 Top Celebrities
400 Richest Americans
Largest Private Cos
World's Richest People
All Forbes Lists
Business Opinions
Investing
Technology Opinions
Washington & The World
Companies
People
Reference
Technology
Companies
Events
People
Reference
Companies
People
Companies
Events
People
Reference
Companies
Events
People
Reference































CEO Compensation
#395 Keith E Wandell

04.04.12, 12:00 PM EDT










 O B Grayson Hall


 Ronald B Johnson







Total Compensation
$3.405 mil
5-Year Compensation
NA
Education:
College: NA
Graduate School: NA




Keith E Wandell has been CEO of Harley-Davidson
	(HOG) for 3 years.
	Mr. Wandell has been with the company for 3 years.
	The 62 year old executive ranks 10 within Consumer Durables


Keith E Wandell's Compensation vs. Consumer Durables Medians


Salary$0.98 mil$1.22 mil


Bonus$2.34 mil$3.00 mil


Other$0.08 mil$3.01 mil


Stock GainsNA$0.00 mil


Total Compensation$3.405 mil$7.33 mil





Keith E Wandell Ownership Of Harley-Davidson


Industry Medians


Stock Owned (% Of Co)0.10%0.10%


Stock Owned$11.3 mil$0.02 mil


Harley-Davidson's Stock Performance


Total Return During Tenure35%


Relative to Market113




Harley-Davidson

(HOG: quote,
				news)
				
3700 West Juneau AvenueMilwaukee, WI 53208Wisconsin


www.harley-davidson.com








 O B Grayson Hall


 Ronald B Johnson




CEO Compensation

Complete Coverage | Complete Rankings



Methodology: 
	Compensation rank is based on total compensation for latest fiscal year. Total compensation for each chief executive includes the following: salary and bonuses; other compensation, such as vested restricted stock grants, LTIP payouts and perks; and stock gains, the value realized by exercising stock options. Efficiency rank is based on our chief executive's performance/pay score. Ranks are given only to chief executives who have a six-year tenure and six-year compensation history. The most efficient rank is 1 and least efficient is 206.

Footnotes: 
	Compensation data is from the latest available proxy statements filed through Mar. 23, 2012. Total returns and value of stock owned (including all classes) is based on Mar. 14, 2012 stock price. Compensation percent change is based on combined salary and bonus. Annualized total return during tenure covers the tenure of the executive or from the time of the IPO or available stock history. Relative to market is the ending value of $100 invested in the stock, divided by the ending value of $1 invested in the S & P 500 (a score of 100 = the S & P 500). NA: Not available or not applicable.  
1Annualized.
	2Four-year total.
	3Three-year total.
	4Less than 0.01%.
	5Prior-year data.
	6New chief executive; compensation may be for another executive office.
	7Less than $100,000.
	8Includes shares indirectly held.
	*Return is for less than tenure.
	
Sources: Company SEC filings; Interactive Data, LionShares and Thomson Reuters Fundamentals via FactSet Research Systems; Forbes.






The Most Influential Angel Investors On AngelListMicrosoft Bets On Nook As Coke Eyes MonsterWill CIOs Vanish Into The Cloud?Gilt Groupe's Growth Lessons


Read All Comments






































Produce












































Our History
About
Beverage

Food





About
Products
Resources
Locations
News
Events
Recipes
Members
Contact
Careers
Recalls





Careers
Contact





















Menu


Home







Products


Brands


Exclusive Brands


Featured Brands



New Stocking Items

Featured Products


New Products 


Produce


Frozen Food


Grocery


Center of the Plate


Dairy


Non-Food


Equipment & Supplies


Resources


Product Categories


Product Catalog










Choose your location
 Amarillo
 Dallas/Fort Worth
 Gulf Coast
 Mid-South
 New Mexico
 Oklahoma
 San Antonio
 Southeast









Produce



Markon Eat With Your Hands



Markon RSS Salads



Crimson Queen Tomatoes from Lipman Produce



Sun Rich




Gills Onions



RSS Cauli Creations



Markon Ready Set Serve Triple Washed Spinach



Markon First Crop Tomatoes




Markon Ready-Set-Serve Avocado Pure Pulp



MARKON FRESH FROZEN FRUIT



Well’s Blue Bunny Ice Cream



CALAVO The First Name In Avocados




Markon Specialty Produce



DEL MONTE Snack Packs & Salads



MARKON Kale Color Crunch™



KRAFT Golden Italian Dressing




Fall in Love with Fall Produce



KRAFT 1000 Island Dressing



MARKON First Crop Melons



MARKON Red Currant Berries




MARKON RAMBUTAN



MARKON CHERIMOYAS



MARKON FIRST CROP Eggplant



MARKON Shishito Peppers




Awesome Avocados



Idaho Potatoes



MARKON Heirloom Spinach Blend



MARKON American Salad Blend




MARKON First Crop: Lunch Bunch Grapes



Markon Iceberg - Premium



Markon Ready-Set-Serve Cleaned and Trimmed Brussel Sprouts



Driscoll Strawberries










Our History
Food Locations
Beverage Locations


















1933
Prohibition Ended









1931
Ben E. Keith









1928
Ben E. Keith Meets Adolphus Busch









1919
Dallas, Abilene and more warehouses









1906
Harkrider-Morrison & Ben E. Keith









2006
100th Anniversary









2008
Beverage Division Purchases C.R. Goodman Co









1982
Budweiser Light Introduced into the Market









1984
Company Charged into the Computer Age









1989
Great Distributor Organization Award









2000
Kevin Bartholomew is Named President of Beverage












Texas
Oklahoma
Louisiana
New Mexico
Kansas
Colorado
Arkansas
Tennessee
Mississippi
Nebraska
Missouri
Georgia
Alabama
Florida








Abilene
Austin
Conroe
Dallas
Dodge City
La Feria
Lowell
Lubbock
Shreveport
Midland/Odessa
Tulsa
Wichita










Abilene
Brownwood
Commerce
Dallas
Denton
Fort Worth
Frisco
Kerrville
Llano
Palestine
Waco
Weatherford








Abilene
Amarillo
Austin
Brownwood
College Station
Commerce
Corpus Christi
Dallas
Denton
El Paso
Fort Worth
Frisco
Houston
Kerrville
Llano
Lubbock
McAllen
Palestine
San Antonio
Waco
Weatherford









© 2017. Ben E Keith.     Home About Food beverage careers contact Privacy Policy


Website by Giles-Parscale Inc.













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip
















